Wordsworth
And at this moment one of those beliefs, the main beliefs that puts a halt to changing all other beliefs, that is stored in your subconscious is saying, “Then there is nothing I can do, this seems rather permanent”
From the rumours she’d heard Brasov Elementary used to house wayward children back in the 18th century and the top tower with its barred window was supposed to be the room a teenage girl called Asema hung herself after being caught climbing down the trellis at night to meet her lover. Brasov High was housed in the old sandstone building now called the library. It was 500 meters to the left of the main school shrouded by tall trees and cloaked in shade. An undercover walkway was the only access. Behind the library was the swimming pool that lay empty it had gargoyle statues guarding it and giant concrete goats standing at either end? Ornate decorations formed the bottom of the pool and if it was a clear day the rumours suggested the decorative drawing was the lovers entangled in a brace doomed forever. However it was off limits to all students.
Remember the corporate buzz words from a few years ago? Coach and develop?
Tea, straight up. Coffee, no thank you.
Sports medicine involves more than just the diagnosing and treatment of sports-related injuries. This aspect of the medical field has many different facets that contribute to the health and wholeness of athletes. Not only is this field important to professional sports players, but it is beneficial to those in college, high school, middle school and even athletes who are much younger.
Country Bumpkin - aromas from a country prim pie, very spicy.
For a second disbursement, worth $15 million in city funds, Forest City would have to itemize another $25 million in "Eligible State Project Costs."
Lee S. Fehling, 28, Wantagh, N.Y.
that ruffles your clothes
IT.
I got an email today from hystersisters.com telling me Happy Hysterversary. To be honest, I had not even thought about it that today was the 1 year mark of when I had my surgery. It has been a really long year and there have been ups and downs and everything finally seems to be leveling out.
* Roller skates, as opposed to blades
Well, my son is almost two years old and I have lost 65 of that 80 pounds. I would like to lose an additional 10… so I still have 25 to go. Barf! In the middle of February I joined a gym and I have been a regular visitor, so about 3-5 times/week. Well, I haven’t lost any weight until this week finally – down 2.5 lbs. Oh, yippy (can you feel the sarcasm?). Ok, to be honest, I went through a couple weeks where all I wanted to do was drink beer. I literally craved beer. This is my first week without a sip so far: it is only Friday.
1.) You like Celine Dion and Mariah Carey
Ok, I might be stretching the poetic license a little, but I had the most amazing time at Imhoff Farm. Upon arrival, I visited their darling little nursery, Imhoff Plants, where I found the healthiest herbs I've seen in ages. They also have a great selection of plants that are well-known for their healing properties - they specialise in these types of plants. After I'd wandered around the nursery, we visited the Old Cape Wine Shop, where we bought two bottles of wine - a Whalehaven Cabernet Franc 2007 (what a cracker of a wine!) and a Noble Late Harvest from Weltevrede. The charming assistant was a great help and invited us to come back for their wine tasting that is held between 11am and 2pm.
This afghan also uses a granny square type of technique. Love the colors of this one too, the recipients favorite colors. In the picture the bright stripe might look a little yellow, but it is a green color. Sorry folks, can't find the pattern for this right now, and don't have a lot of time to look. If I run across it, I promise to post it later!
That won’t have the same effect when they are being dealt with by a ‘fluorescent’ orange jacketed security officer who has stopped them for a particular sector of crime and they won’t be able to say that because of course they will only be employed to deal with that type of offence, oh, sorry, it’s already happening, we have already started to employ security in to our custody areas, and ‘traffic officers’ on motorways, as well as security officers who can deal with shoplifting. So when they say you should be catching _________________(fill in the blank), they will be able to say ‘actually, no I’m not authorised’.
All the problems, all the fears
I'm hoping getting my weeks planned out (especially this week) will help me feel more in control of the chaos around me. And, I'm also hoping that soon my weekly schedule will be full of appointments of people who want to come see the house. Keep your fingers crossed for a quick sale for us! The sooner we can get out of here, the better!! I can't wait!
Drink a rum and a ponche de creme…because you going to need it!
A big hello to all my friends in Blogland! It's Marie here and I am excited to share with you a Design Team card i created for ICopic Lover. I selected an adorable stamp called Mermaid Marci by La-La Land Crafts. The size of this stan makes it perfect for cards or projects and the size is large enough that it makes it fun and easy to color with those Copic Markers!
Today I drove past the maple again, and as I approached, it dawned on me that perhaps it’s not the tree itself, but the overall outline of the tree’s shape that interests me. I slowed down and saw the tree in a new way. If one were to follow the top of the tree’s branches--the very points where they meet the sky--one might make a line drawing very much like a dot-to-dot picture that children do in coloring books. This morning I noticed that outline, and I noticed also that it was almost a perfect half circle. That must have some meaning for me. It felt right to recognize it. It was beautiful, round, welcoming--a sheltering arc rising above the field and road.
2) I'm in the "grow-mode".
I still write poetry, but the weight of that form is lighter on me now.
This guy is so ready to be 5. Big things happen when you're 5. Like you get to be big like your brother. You get to go to school in the fall (When is fall again????). You get to pick 5 candies instead of 4. Unfortunately, you also have to eat 5 bites of your dinner instead of 4 (he didn't see that one coming...he he he)
This is genocide through racial assimilation.
So if I think it is in your interests to look at emigration because it might improve your chances of living to be an old coffin dodger, believe me I will try and convince you to do it.
For my card, I stamped Fleuriste Newsprint on black cardstock with Versamark and embossed with white embossing powder. I wrapped black pleated ribbon around my panel, then layered on crochet lace, and twisted silk ribbon. I tied a pretty red silk bow and added a rhinestone/pearl button. I adhered that panel to red mirror cardstock, then to a white card.
The smoking ban coupled with years of the drip-feed abuse from Govt against smokers has caused this hatred on the false and unproven assumption that parents who smoke cause harm to their own children.
This is the struggle of all residents of Nonadanga, we must win this struggle
Luckily there are a slew of options out there:
not a mark scars His features.
Brighton Polytechnic 26th March 1977
The woman walking up their porch steps looked more like a farmer than anything else. Her work clothes were stained with mud, and her short, white hair peeked out from under a crumpled men’s hat. The only thing remotely witchy about her was that even though her wrinkles meant she must be at least seventy, she
This is the recipe for the flag Jello that we have every year on the Fourth of July. It's also known as Seven Layer Jello Salad and is my Aunt Bev's recipe.
It's funny. It took me a really long time to get into that series. I think what really had me go into wanting to see the whole series was all about conquering fears. I was 15 at the time, and I'd just made friends with a girl that seemed, in my mind, absolutely fearless. We had so much in common, and she was just so much stronger than me, mentally and emotionally.
Ms Learoyd added: “Fostering is a great way for people to have the enjoyment of being around youngsters whilst helping us out in the short-term. Just like teenagers, these young horses need experience of life, a day to day routine and a guiding hand. Being a fosterer is a really rewarding experience. You can see these youngsters’ personalities change and develop as they grow.”
What’s more, she told us, when men as well as women leave work to pick up kids—or if dad does the drop-off at the onsite daycare center— the stigma, and that maternal wall, starts to go away. “In an ideal world,” Galinsky said, “work would work for you and your employer, and there are some policies that would help you do that, but where the rubber hits the road is how your supervisor and coworkers treat you. You can work at a company that has fantastic policies, or live in a country that has fantastic policies, and you can still have a horrible situation. There has to be a culture where people value personal and family time.”
The dragon eggs have fallen into the wrong hands. The Slayers must work together to stop the eggs from hatching. They will fight; they will fall in love. But will they survive?
Are you surprised at how well (or not) your country performs compared to others ?
+ Thelonious Monk - Brilliant Corners - 1957
It was a good meeting. Any time Helen Gym stands up to speak her mind, it’s gonna be a good meeting. She was awesome yesterday at the hearing before the school board. She’s done her homework, put the Knudson proposal to the test and finds it an empty shell. Only one of several impressive voices.
Wow wee, its been some time since my last post...I have been busy to say the least. Between Halloween Festitivities, Scrapbook Expo, my children's activities...I'm barely finding a moment to finish up some Layout's I've started.
I've never been a fan of Islamic swimwear, or the "burkini" if you will. I've contemplated purchasing one on many different occasions, however, regardless of my feelings on their look, but always talked myself out of it.
The one that’s held within the rune
Mint leaves – a small handful
Get the family involved. Give everyone a task, and then do something relaxing afterwards, like watching a movie together or going to the park for a walk.
This position will be an advocate for public interest law and will be responsible for maintaining an institutionalized, formal Pro Bono Honors Pledge Program that promotes specific work opportunities and offers students guidance in selecting pro bono projects.
Flesch-Kincaid : 8.4
MBA sights that there should still be some foreseeable government role to ensure investor confidence, liquidity and stability to homeownership and rental housing. This would mean of course that there would have to be private investors (not Fannie and Freddie) who would furnish the money to reimburse the mortgage originators so they could have more capital to make additional loans; which of course is risky within itself.
Concerto for Violin & Orchestra (1955) ** UNMISSABLE ** / Theme & Cadenza for Solo Violin & Orchestra (1949)
Rest long least at last, dry of the water from this frustrating bath
By the fast setting sun;
RT: Jonathan Martin; Lydon Murtha
“Who’re they?” I said hopefully. I saw that my question changed nothing. Betty gulped and shrugged, breathed deeply and said,
Finn: "What are you singing, Mom?"
According to the report, it was only then that the officers noticed another man in the back of the van with another prostitute.
Viewers have complained to the BBC after the outspoken presenter made a series of controversial remarks about the country's clothing, trains, food and history. At one point, Clarkson appeared to make light of the lack of sanitation for poor residents by driving around slums in a Jaguar fitted with a toilet. And? It's not the wittiest way of making the point but unless it's actually wrong and Indian slums typically have indoor plumbing, piped water supplies and sewers now I don't see the problem. These people are dreadfully poor and literally don't have a pot to piss in. I'm not saying that Clarkson was subtly highlighting the issue of Indian poverty but it's not as if he was saying something that isn't true. Even if he was the appropriate response is rebuttal, not howls of righteous outrage and the usual demand to have him sacked and flogged with broken glass.
8. Web and SMS based Complaints and Suggestions Management System for all Railway customers
Fourth, we do good so that we can be assured of our right standing before God. Faith alone justifies, but the faith that justifies is never alone. By bearing good fruit, we show that we are a good tree (Matt. 7:15-20) and make our calling and election sure (2 Peter 1:10).
SEOUL, South Korea -- "If they can do that in South Korea, we can do it right here in the United States of America."
But it is time that we take our enemy seriously because of the high stakes for which this war is being fought. Spiritual warfare is often misunderstood because it is assumed that demonic activity in our lives only begins with overt activity which can clearly be assigned to demons.
Interview with Lord Midas Welby
“America runs on Dunkin” or eating Taco Bell really is “thinking outside the bun.”
YOU’RE MISSING THE POINT!
Humbert is a superbly written character and a credit to Nabokov’s skills as an author – that he could present such a wretch of a man in an entertaining and semi-sympathetic form is incredible. I found Humbert was far more interesting in scenes with adults; which really highlighted the darkly humorous sides to his murderous thoughts and unstable character. Humbert’s inadequacies in adult life are truly entertaining (particularly the scenes with older women). One of the aspects I most enjoyed about Humbert was his apparent hypocrisy and the moments of clarity that would strike him when he would lament his sexual abuse of Lolita, before suddenly twisting back to imagining ‘nymphets’ in his power.
Red patterned top - Primark
Page 2 has accidentals. They looked navigable to me, since they were spaced out among white keys.
Have you done any traveling?
Laws that have been enacted by a properly instituted and recognized branch of the government.
That laid golden eggs –
The homeowners meeting last night-there isn't much good to say about it except for the fact that I got to knit for 2 hours. My cardigan is on addi turbo needles. The questions started getting stupid and repetitive which got me knitting faster. Beth gave me a dirty look and said that my needles were clicking very loud.
But ask yourself: Why are all these conferences getting these incredible, long-term TV deals? Why are Delany and Slive floating the trial balloon of expanding scholarships? What’s the end game?
Recently on an impromptu outing with my group of friends I got told I was too much of a tomboy for a “real” relationship by one of my close friends. She hadn’t yet picked up on the fact that the guy sitting at the table next to me was in fact there with me. She proceeded to ramble about how I needed to wear more dresses and throw on some more flashy makeup if I ever wanted men to pay any interest in me. I was at a loss for words – a dear friend of mine was basically saying that my real self wasn’t good enough.
I'm lying.
* Actually, Kevin Bacon's wispy yet sideburny coif was pretty terrible and made me think of someone leaning up against a van with blackened windows asking 7th graders if they'd ever seen a real raccoon up close.
I have been involved with a case competition organized by Accounting Students Association and WHK accounting firm in the middle of April.
So I came up with a checklist of things I've seen that mean I won't be requesting the book. Several of the examples, by the way, are from actual review requests. If any writers hopeful for a review are reading this, please ask yourself if your email contains
then I thought I might have heard her say
Afghans do not see the Taliban as a nationalist movement based on the Pashtunwali code, but influenced by Deobandi madrassas in Pakistan. They are not even a unified group. Not even all Afghan Taliban call themselves Pashtun nationalists. Although they are predominately Pashtun, many among them are from other ethnic groups, particularly in Northern Afghanistan. Local insurgent groups have multiple motivations. Some join the resistance against the perceived foreign invaders, while others fight for local purposes, such as clan rivalries and personal interests. Then there are those who fight for money.
Planned Mileage This Week: 28
That bring a heart's desire,
Reproductive responsibilities--from birth control to child care -- to be equally shared between men and women, and the understanding that 'reproduction' is not only a female function.
John Brett Cahill, 56, Wellesley, Mass.
For me she absolutely nailed the Twitter experience on the head. At the very beginning, she writes about how you join Twitter: the vehement hatred and outright denial of the pre-Twitter individual, and how their curiosity eventually gets the better of them and they become hooked, just like everyone else. I DID THAT. She explores the kinds of people who inhabit the Twitter universe, the online personas, the different breeds of celebrity and how they interact with the masses, how people use it in everyday life, the conversations, the viral videos and links, and Twitter cliques. There is a glance at the social politics of following and unfollowing, and the etiquette of messaging other people without looking like an eejit. The good, the bad and the downright ugly, it's all here - and as far as my own Twitter wanderings go, it's absolutely spot-on.
The book will be a compilation of 100 essays, all from this blog. I plan to break the book into sections, such as coping with change and loss, family, overcoming fear and uncertainty, learning how to love yourself, and overcoming obstacles.
I love how the distressed edges of the Lagoon paper lets the white core show through and provides a border between it and the Kraft background.
Most of us believe that the beans add body weight. Almonds, walnuts, and apricots have a good healthy fats and cholesterol. One ounce of almonds is a healthy snack to control hunger and make the stomach feel full longer, thus controlling your appetite.
I was understandably tearful when I came into work. And I've spent most of the day sobbing at my desk.
They refused to give me a lift back to my flat and I declined their offer of a bed for the night. So, alas, I still have a lot to learn about Australian policing but I am sure there will be more updates in this area before my tour of duty is up.
Bivariate – more than one dependent variable
Lime - 2
new henry plates and cups.
That improper performance would be effected in breach of the relevant expectation of you or me, (See sections 4 & 5) that political parties would not dish out favours for cash. (I did type that with a straight face, honest.)
To get a professional opinion on the issue, I read an article by John Donatich, director of Yale University Press, in the Journal of Scholarly Publishing entitled “Why Books Still Matter.”
Mix milk, remaining sugar, flour and yeast mixture in a large plastic or glass container, (metal objects ****** Herman’s natural growth.) Stir, using only a wooden spoon or paddle.
As Johnny Mac screams: “You cannot be serious!”
Garlic powder- 1 tsp
NOTHING TO HIDE FROM MRS MAY
My friends and I would always tell them we weren't into guys and had signals to help get us away. At this point in my life I am extremely blunt and just tell the creeps to go away. But I do remember dancing with my sorority sisters and some guy who I had never seen before would come up and start grinding his pelvis into my back thinking this was attractive. Reality check, you just lost any chance you had, if I wanted to dance with you I would have, now back off!!
Honesty once set me free
It feels like Monday today as Hubby has gone in to work and was off on Friday. So I guess I must be a naughty Mummy as Zac isn't at pre-school, it's nearly 1pm and we're all still in our pyjamas and the lounge floor is a compilation of various bits of train track and lego. Something I have no intention of clearing up until oooh at least bedtime!
I am about to be a school Mum.
Nike 6.0 BMX Open July 23-24 Chicago, Ill. – Museum Campus
As a prime example, take the song "yummy yummy yummy I've got love in my tummy". Sounds innocent enough, right? That's until you realise that you can't actually eat love, what with it being an abstract concept. So what kind of love is in my tummy? The only conclusion you can draw is that it refers to seminal discharge, making the whole thing a massive reference to oral sex.
*Post about this giveaway on your blog and make sure to mention it in your post here
Third, Focus on it. Don’t get distracted. If you are distracted your energies are divided.
Looking forward to a busy, busy, BUSY Spring ♥
Very Romantic ... Thinks relationships are just like in the movies, and by movies I mean porn.
Pouring concrete into giant holes isn’t sexy, skyscrapers with shiny windows are.
We offer the caravan accommodation, including free electricity & water, plus a share of veggies from the garden in season. The caravan has a shower and portaloo, a heater for when needed, sleeps two, (14ft) and is basic but comfortable. Possible use of small area of land for own cultivation.
I wish I could think of ways to improve upon the challenge, but I have none. The Linky list allowed for checking out different blogs. The use of the Next Blog and Surprise Me buttons also made navigating to different blogs very easy. THAT one was a huge plus. Having multiple people working as co-hosts helped to spread the responsibility, ensured one person - alone - didn't get bogged down by the mundane busy-ness of the day-to-day planning, inquiries and erm, well, insanity :-)
While some extremists and terrorists may wear kaffiyehs, "To reduce their meaning to support for terrorism has a tacit racist tone to it," Bishara said.
Watch the lightning
I thought I put here a quote worth thinking and meditating over as Reformed apologists, to work on our humility in light of our beliefs in the Sovereignty of God:
Instead, I looked out from my nice, shaded little tent onto a sea of guests fanning themselves with their wedding programs.
His death and resurrection
Since time immemorial, their neurotic romance.
your life changes with no warning!!
Two loves. Olive Green. Border.
In Souless, in my opinion the best of the series, Alexia is described as wearing a green ballgown with a cuirass bodice and carrying a brass handled frilly black parasol with purple satin pansies. She also wears wood and silver hairsticks in her hair.
1 hour…
Aswan’s Phoenix: +5 All Stats, +1 Weapon/Magic ATT, +150 Weapon/Magic DEF, +60 Accuracy, +65 Avoidability. You get it if you clear Hard mode without dying.
This book is a work of genius. The book is written from the perspective of a demon who is learning how to lead people away from faith in Christ. So insightful, and will often feel like he’s writing about your actual life. Will change the way you think.
All-Attractive Aniruddha, profoundly dexterous, must be prospering!? So too must be all the great sons and grandsons of Kṛṣṇa like Suṣeṇa, Cārudeṣṇa, Sāmba, Jāmbavatī’s son, Ṛṣabha and so on…
Rose and his sponsors
b. The second hole was placed so that when a spigot was inserted, a watering can could be placed underneath it to be filled.
This is my second - and last - week as a guest designer for Stamp With Fun. This week we have picked "acetate" as the theme of the challenge. Use it however you want to. I made this acetate box and filled it with yummy M&Ms.
Make your blood run green
The more you keep trying to deny that He exists- the more you’ll have to waste your time and energy to prove He doesn’t and continually fight within yourself that He is not real and that you can do whatever it is that you want.
The movers show up a week from today to box us up for Rio. I'm kinda spazzing about it.
A first-person narrator, Harry (not his real name), is recalling his interviews with a man named Niki Landau, who is sitting at his stand at the audio fair when a Russian womman named Yekaterina "Katya" Orlova comes up to him asking, "Excuse me, sir. Are you the gentleman from Abercrombie & Blair?" He replies no, that this is the wrong stand, and that she's in fact looking for Scott "Barley" Blair. Landau tells her that Blair did not decide to "occupy his stand" at the fair, but that if she wants to give anything to Blair, she can give it to him and he can take it to Blair. To make sure the authorities don't see, Landau encourages her to act like she's kissing him while he smuggles a brown-paper parcel out of her bag and into his briefcase.
(Getty Images)
I jumped up like a startled cat and leaped two feet in the air and three feet sideways. One step over and I'd have been in the field, trespassing. Again.
“We would want to burn fuel containing the additive specifically when the aircraft was cruising in the lower stratosphere,” he adds.
Young Iraqis are to hold a Valentine's Day rally on Monday to call on their leaders to love the war-battered country rather than rob its resources, an organiser told AFP.
E-books, while convenient and accessible will never replace any of that. They require an energy source to read, sometimes irritate with their flash to black when turning a page and contain components of disposable technology that are toxic to the environment.
Now Trump has taken on Scotland's First Minister. Last month, he said that Alex Salmond would become known as 'Mad Alex' over his plans for the wind farms. Dignified as always, Big Eck has responded to Trump's diatribe thus:
One pkg each of 3mm, and 4mm Chocolate flatback Pearls
Some of my relatives also attended the reunion and apparently they haven't met the other relatives even though they just live here in L.A. altogether. ... So weird everyone felt like strangers at first. haha.. Except for our family because we were the "guests" from the Philippines.
“That’s just crazy talk!” he sneered. “They obviously work as a team.”
We walked in and the first words his teacher says to him are, "Brent, good morning! You look like you are ready for a nap in those pajamas!" I am not exaggerating when I say everyone in the school...and possibly across the street heard him scream, "NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!"
And would insist
Turn your vase as you work to make sure there are no "holes" and to create a uniform shape. In this arrangement, the overall shape is that of an umbrella. It helps to visualize an umbrella as you create.
“If you’re walking in, turn on the light,” she barks.
In a society rampant with infidelity (ladies, as an experiment, put up a “missed connections” ad on Craigslist and see just how many married men reply), when does our silence become part of the overall problem?
I even find myself having future conversations in my head,
LL: (giggles) No. I forgot about that. I haven’t. I’m actually quite timid so if I’d done it, it would’ve been a really big deal for me.
Well I don’t, I don’t think it’s come to that. He’s, he’s giving an account of himself as we are speaking right now. I haven’t been able to see that. Let’s let Chilcot do his work and do his report, and then I think we can make more of a judgment.
The court held that to justify denial of insurance coverage, any misrepresented facts had to be “material” or that respondent engaged in “fraudulent conduct.” The court noted that respondent admitting that some of his sworn testimony had been incorrect did not satisfy the “heavy burden of proof” to demonstrate that the insurance policy had been breached.
There were plenty of names for it. The Tattooed Man, the Vandalized One, the Defaced. Most were male, which was in and of itself a misnomer; it always appeared as the same sex and roughly the same age to the person that beheld it.
The truth is that marriage does not maximize individual happiness in terms of questions like: Do I get sufficient and consistent sleep? Do I have time to pursue my labours of love and pastime passions? Can I get a weekly massage and set out on an orgiastic vacation whenever I acrue the hours as it impacts no one but me? But, for me, marriage offers a new and exciting stage in my development as an adult human animal, and as an emotional and political subject, that would indeed add to my overall personal fulfillment and that I recognize will be mostly gruelling moment-to-moment. Presently, I’m bored of myself; I’m bored of being by myself; I’m bored of talking and thinking only for and about myself. And in watching my extended family age and die off, the starker and bleaker sides of reality are becoming more apparent to me—I might get cancer, or have a heart attack or stroke, or someone I am romantically invested in might, and I wholeheartedly want to either be the last face someone sees in this world or trust that I will lock eyes and fingers with someone else as I leave it myself and that we will have a shared history between us, only we can read in each other’s eyes, of having watched and nurtured at least one other human being through every stage of their life that we could; I want to know the true depths of self-sacrifice and loss or grief and the dazzling heights and elations of personal fulfilment or playing a quintessential role in the fulfillment and happiness of an interconnected group of others; I want to know the true meaning of trust, openness and willingness to change and be changed and to change and impact others (not to satisfy my ego or impose my will or vision onto their identity or fate or to their detriment, but instead, tuned to their respective aptitudes and goals) that I believe only a foil, a life partner, could incite and excite in me; I need people around me, intimate to me, to keep me alive, living, and on my toes and I think that’s universal but I could be wrong.
She made that for me last night. She always does great job.
I cannot wait to see this plan come together!
Historically, this may end up being seen as a turning point. Australian politics shifted dramatically to the right in the 1980s, when the Hawke-Keating government embraced its free-market mantra. As they stole the ground of reforming liberals, they pushed the Liberal Party further to the right and into the embrace of neo-conservatism.
4. Take care of your body
Envivio makes the world’s video content universally enjoyable by all viewers, on any device, across any network, at any time. Our advanced software-based solutions, available on 1-RU appliances or IT blade servers, perform IP-based video encoding/transcoding, processing, packaging, ad insertion and delivery for broadcast TV, HTTP streaming and mobile video services. Envivio products are used by more than 300 of the world’s leading telecom, cable and satellite service providers, content owners, terrestrial broadcasters and mobile service operators to deliver high quality video streams to mobile phones, tablets, set-top boxes, and PCs serving tens of millions of viewers.
Shot taken with a Minolta Maxxum 3xi (consumer film 35mm SLR) with a 70-210 lens and scanned into the digital world.
I feel the frustration within me rise.
The video I'm posting here will go nuclear.
failing easily every day
We're getting close to the big Summer movie season, and although my theater-going experience has been almost non-existent lately I'm still pretty geeked for it. Maybe I'll get out more this Summer than I have this Winter or Spring? Eh, maybe. Maybe not. I hate people lighting up their cell phones 3D prices and blah blah blah. Enough of that. Anyway though, here the crew from That's a Wrap discussing the top 5 Most Anticipated 2012 Summer Movies. Below that I'll drop by personal Top 5, which differs a bit. Yours?
Me: “Ok, see ya then. Bye.”
Use your ruler to draw three intersecting lines on both the yellow and red circles. If drawn correctly, the 3 intersecting lines will divide the circles into 6 equal parts. I chose to divide the circles for my kids because I didn't want to deal with the headache of 24 kids not being able to make equal pieces.
Why is it that every time travel paradox movie that comes down the pike consists of two types? One is thoroughly plotted down to every minute so every possibility is covered - just to appease nit-picking geeks like yours truly - the other has a basic story line of action, drama, romance, whatever... and just happens to have a time traveling thread within its storyline, just so they can throw a bone to the phrase, "oh by the way: this all happens because they went back/forward in time".
I look at guys and they don’t look like they want to play. I told them at halftime, If you don’t want to play, just stay in the locker room, because it don’t make sense for a team who we should beat to just demolish us. – Dwight Howard
79. Sehun positioned as Lead Dancer, and included in the subgroup of EXO-K.
People flooded all around that day since so many started after kick off like me, but not nearly as many as I thought. While I took one break huddled under a large bush for shade, an older woman passed and I knew at once it was Listener, who also recognized me instantly. I met her over in PA on the AT.
As a hobby, it was too much effort for me to figure out over 3,000 years of Chinese dynastic history prior to the Opium Wars in the 1800’s.
“You can always turn back. It’s moving forwards that’s tough,” Henry says. I ponder this for a while, neither of us eager to speak. It’s hard to tell the time of day in a forest but it must be early afternoon.
You can’t think ‘gladiator’ without ‘slave’ following close behind. In addition to discovering the ‘truth’ about Crassus, I also wanted to explore the nature of the relationship between slave and master. In Rome, everyone who was anyone had at least one or two. What must that have been like? How did they survive the trauma of losing everything? How could they find love and keep it when their lives were not their own?
School investigators are probing a veteran school custodian who owns 10 houses in Queens worth a combined $5.8 million -- and whose former employees contend they were paid with school funds to gut and renovate the homes.
The book is the main reading for my course Economic History of China. Pomeranz’s main argument is simple: Europe and China pursued divergent paths of economic development, one capital-intensive and the other labor-intensive, largely because Europe had the New World to supply them with adequate energy, resources, and labor. I found most parts of his reasoning convincing. In the following, I will supplement my thinking about this issue.
Liquidation, is simple terms, means the end of the company. It is not a process it is a full stop. The company incorporated in 1899 would sell off its assets (subject to charges and secured creditors’ status) and whatever money might be left would be divided amongst the creditors. And that is the end of Rangers.
3.1 Megapixel Camera
With you the world I can only rule
This is a good Mexican style chicken. topped with that deadly white queso. yum! I need to make this again. I did use brown rice and a tiny bit of cheese but the cheese is what makes this dish. I found some spinach queso at Trader Joes, that was perfect. It has spinach in it right? so it cant be all that bad..right?
For help with planning for your own long term care needs, contact the experienced elder law attorneys at Janna Dutton & Associates.
I AM VERY GRATEFUL FOR YOUR SUPPORT
- Downsize their living space successfully
Thus were the start long, senseless e-mails.
The sketch I went with is Mojo Monday Sketch #219. I love all the layers!
The truth is, both kids, if kids could really dig for 7,296 miles through the earth, through rock, magma, molten iron, all of that, both would drown instantly as their shovels pierced the seabed above their heads.
Other documents and interviews show that many E.P.A. scientists are alarmed, warning that the drilling waste is a threat to drinking water in Pennsylvania. Their concern is based partly on a 2009 study, never made public, written by an E.P.A. consultant who concluded that some sewage treatment plants were incapable of removing certain drilling waste contaminants and were probably violating the law. The carcinogens like benzene are a concern, but other elements in the poisonous mixtures being dumped are a threat to public drinking water in other ways.
I'm not completely back into blogging yet though , due to the previously mentioned to-do list, but hopefully I'll be able to post more regularly again.
vocalist and looks like Jim Kerr, thus has many valid
Wait, don't run away! Does the phrase "coconut oil" have you heading for the hills? It's got a bad rap. If you're a regular reader of THIS blog, you've stuck with us through pork fat, chicken fat, butter and cream galore, so don't let a little coconut oil scare you off...
I have a supply of walking aids, including YakTrax or trekking poles, but I have lately been trading my boots for cross country skis. We've also hiked over to the new outdoor skating rink at the Hamilton harbour (by Williams Coffee Pub), slipped on the blades and joined others slicing across the ice!
Okay no more sad, emo thoughts.. it just means I have to start working super hard to transfer school soon..
Dh will be gone for 10 days. 10 long days, this is a busy time of the year here for us, Field trips, Musical rehearsals, Dance performance photos, field day. But it will all be slowing down soon. After May 17th we will be done with School. Yes done with school. We will have 2 weeks of do nothing time., or at least do less time. No school and only dance class once a week. I will be flying solo until dh comes back. No one to stop at the store for me on the way home, there is no store on my way home from school. This happens when you live in the country.
A few posts back, I asked the question whether or not ivy league college educations were worth it. I stand by my original thought that in this environment, it’s not realistic. Those folks who are coming out of college with impressive degrees from even more impressive colleges aren’t finding jobs any faster than those who are graduating from the rest of the schools. In fact, those with ivy league degrees might be having an even harder time because companies just can’t afford the salaries these graduates are asking for (and deserve, I might add).
As I behold the Christ in people with whom I live and work, I behold, appreciate and praise their innate goodness. I recognize that we all are following the divine light within to the best of our ability, no matter what the appearance.
As far as I can tell, people find this blog most often through a Google search (or Yahoo, whatever). And the most common phrase that brings them here is "my husband is mean" or some variation on that theme. They are directed to my post My Husband is Mean to Me and the Kids. I am so saddened by how many women are searching with that phrase.
35. Thee Mighty Caesars - Lie Detector
As a writer, there is a lot of fun in ideas. There's even more fun in trying to find them. And when you're a writer, you see the world through completely different eyes. You're just born that way - with a set of eyes that sees the world through all sorts of different creative angles.
The finishing touch....I sewed french knots in the center of each flower using DMC Pearl Cotton 5 thread and a size 20 tapestry needle. (I used a green plastic needle threader to thread my needle...they look like a loop).
“MODERN BAGEL”
How to deal with them? I agree with Martha Stout’s suggestion that the best method to deal with psychopaths is to detach from them or the situations in which they operate.
3) Penny talk - A calling card which enables you to call over 200 countries, including India, U.S.A & Canada for only 1p per minute!
Jaleel White and Kym Johnson performed a foxtrot. Yes! Smooth and musical! Very good! No trace of Urkel. Score: 9, 8, 9 = 26.
Brendon and Brenna went to bed around 11pm and I was going to join them after getting a few things done around the house but my body had other plans. As soon as I lay down in bed I had a contraction that was a lot stronger then I had been dealing with and decided right then and there that I was probably not going to sleep that night. I was right. Every time I tried to lie down, or even sit, it would make my contractions ten times stronger. I spent all night pacing the house, cleaning and timing contractions. It was rather peaceful spending that time alone and I really enjoyed it. I snacked and listened to my music playlist I had put together a few days before as well as some Hypnobabies tracks. When Brendon woke up at 7am he was surprised that I had been up all night and decided to call off work that day.
We went on forest trekking with our elephants up and down the hill.
Disciplinary Rule 325: Division of Receipts and Payment of Expenses – Clubs shall observe the terms of Scottish Cup Rule 46.
AND every Tuesday nights the kids can register for a chance to win an 820 Sports Bike – a $350 value. Drawing will be held May 30th. 1 entry per child per Tuesday night.
Me: No worries (Who’s worried? Not me with the Alien spiders waiting to explode out of me to have a good old game of basketball)
We thank Him for safety and especially for His presence each moment…..
I went to the bedroom to tell Howard what was going on and he popped up like a jack in the box and began running around like a mad man throwing my things in a bag. I called the doctor who asked me to come in to the hospital to be checked. We ran out the door as our dinner guests were arriving. We told them to help themselves, apologized, and off we went! I remember being terrified, not really knowing just HOW early five weeks was, I kept asking if he would be okay. The nurses assured me that from what they saw he'd be fine and hat he may need the NICU or a little oxygen but that we'd be just fine.
I would really like to write a little about my new home city, Hsinchu, but with our schedules filled with apartment hunting and settling in at new jobs, we haven't had much chance for exploration. And, to be fair, I guess the problem is compounded by the fact that we seem to slip up to Taipei whenever we have some time off. Which is, I guess, one of the best things about Hsinchu-- it's only a quick half an hour trip away from Taipei. This makes a day or an evening in the big city a very easy outing.
May 5th: SG 1.085
It's audition week for our next production so I'm throwing myself into the fray in order to give my public what they crave. I've decided to audition for three parts which is a bit stupid because I've now got three songs to learn instead of one. Heigh Ho.
So I got axed to do a collection of songs based on the theme of BLOOD. Neat! When I think of heavy metal lyrics and blood, I usually think of altars, rituals, chalices and whatnot. Or slightly uncomfortable stances on Nationalism and ancestors and 'homelands'. Or vampires. Or straight-up gore. Goddamn, there's a beautiful rainbow of topics that pertain to blood. Being the free-thinking creative type that I am, I started to look through my collection for songs with blood or bleeding and stuff in the song title. But that doesn't mean that I just slapped together a bunch of blood-related tracks and called it a day (or did I?). Oh no, I've whittled down from many songs a pointed stick of mostly metal to poke you in the ear with. Get out your cotton swabs! So grab a nice cuppa and draw a bath Countess Bathory-style, cause this is what I came up with:
Article 23 If a piece of works delivered by a copyrighter for publishing is lost or damaged due to the publisher's fault, which results in the publication contract can not be performed, the publisher shall be held for civil liabilities according to Article 53 of the Copyright Law, Article 117 of the General Principals of Civil Law, and Article 122 of the Contract Law.
The Front Page?
When It Was Music.
With each passing moment
But then it was time to leave. Leaving into a strong current is a cake walk if there is nothing directly ahead of you—but if you have mega-yacht row downstream, with the first big shiny yacht a boat length away—leaving gets trickier. Or technique was to angle our bows out into the current by going in reverse—then when we were pointed into the middle (and past the power boat) we hit it with
Alnwick (AN-ik, with a silent l and w) is a small market town in north Northumberland. The town's population was just over 8000 at the time of the 2001 census and Alnwick's district population was 31,029.
As a general internist with a small concierge practice I have tried to coordinate my patients’ care and dealings within a complex, bureaucratic and dysfunctional health system. Patients have access to me 24 hours a day, seven days per week by telephone, cell phone, email and text messaging. I do not have an answering service so all after-hours calls are forwarded directly to me. During the initial patient orientation visit we discuss the need to keep me abreast of their health concerns and problems so I can bring the big picture to their immediate and localized health concern or problem. Similar information goes out in my quarterly newsletter and is on my web site. I am trying to reach the technologically sophisticated patients as well as the technologically challenged.
- When shop vac’s suction water and SUPER bubble juice it turns the shop vac into a giant bubble maker.
Romans 12:4-8 says “For just as we have many members in one body and all the members do not have the same function, so we, who are many, are one body in Christ, and individually members one of another. Since we have gifts that differ according to the grace given to us, each of us is to exercise them accordingly: if prophecy, according to the proportion of his faith; if service, in his serving; or he who teaches, in his teaching; or he who exhorts, in his exhortation; he who gives, with liberality; he who leads, with diligence; he who shows mercy, with cheerfulness.”
83. Been in a band? - Not me, but my first two boyfriends were in bands. Boyfriend number one played saxophone, and boyfriend number two played electric and string bass. Second boyfriend is the true musician - he still makes his living that way. He was a bit of a prodigy. He went to a jazz clinic once (I went with him), jammed for the bass player giving the clinic, and when they finished the jam, that musician walked across the stage to shake boyfriend number two's hand. He was all of 17 at the time.
And Baked In Tomato Cheese Sauce
I know. It’s going to bust my clean-living diet all to hell. But Ad hoc’s Buttermilk Fried Chicken is a mountain I must climb, so be it. I’m also going to climb the Leek Bread Pudding mountain, and the Peperonata Rustica mountain, and the Pineapple Upside Down Cake mountain. That’s a lot of climbing for Saturday, but I think I’m up to it.
So I bought it. For the low price of 0.75$! Regular 3.99$, but they've been at 1.50$ for as long as I've been looking at them. So I saved 50% really. With that saving, I decided to buy the extra alphas for 0.75$ as well (regular 1.00$). So I paid the same price for the kit AND the extra alphas that I would've normally paid for just the kit. I'm happy with that. Especially when that price is 1.50$ (a little more for me because of the exchange rate).
I don't care about ideology. Ideology never fixed a damn thing. Ideology is for suckers. I am only interested in practical solutions to clearly defined problems.
Let us know if we missed any of your favourites.
Tell me your biggest conference fear in the comments. Or best conference horror story!
He was later taken to the Grootvlei police station where he laid charges against the "officers" and he was released on a warning - no bail required.
Offspring of water and fire
This new diagnosis would make individuals, but more specifically males, who commit or attempt rape be seen as ill instead of as a criminal. Rape and rape fantasies would become a mental illness.
poisoning.
In California, where there was only a single proton beam accelerator from 2003 to 2006, men were 5.5 times more likely to get this therapy. In 2007, researchers reported that the allowed amount for IMRT for prostate cancer was $58, 610 per person, over twice as much as IMRT (which is substantially more expensive than conventional radiation therapy). Harvard Link. Proton beam therapy centers cost at least $30 million to build, and as much as over $200 million if they have multiple rooms.
Preheat oven @ 180C and grease 9 x 9 in square pan.
B: Obvious naman ‘di ba? – 25%
This is a hard one! It's like making me choose between my children! I think for me, my favourite is also the one that means the most to me and speaks most strongly to me. That would be the Imagination Rules the World design. I think everyone can be imaginative and be creative, it's just about unlocking it and getting out of your mind! Art and design is such a subjective thing, and whenever people say to me "I can't draw" or "I wish I could draw" I just say to them "rubbish! anyone can draw!" because I genuinely believe that anyone can produce art. For me art is a physical expression of whats in a persons mind, and if you can put pen to paper (or any other medium, sculpture, model etc) and create something that is unique and has meaning to the artist then that to me is art, no matter how "wrong" or "bad" it looks.
Other 3-year-old feedback? “I love the color pink”
So long to 12 glorious days of being a stay at home mama.........I love it so much.
R 4: Sl st over 5 sc, * ch 5, sl st in same st, sl st in next st *. Repeat from * to * twice. Sl st over next 10 sc. Repeat from first * around. Join with sl st to first sc. End off.
with eyes that defend
And for the larger society?
Again among the woodlands
I hope everyone has a Happy Mother's Day.
The ancient story of Sodom and Gomorrah has been used throughout the centuries as a condemnation of homosexuality, to the point where anal sex is referred to as “Sodomy”.
Aren't these beautiful?! One of my wonderful customers came up with this great idea, and I had to make one myself and add on to it. What a perfect gift to give this holiday season--or the perfect craft for your craft night!
Rejection of male activities such as rough and tumble play, games and toys
Bluebeard was getting angry that his wife had not come down yet. The knights arrived and broke down the barricade in the door.
Illinois' pension system is a basket case. It has gone past the point of no return. While pension deficits do not alarm me, when I read that Teachers' Retirement System (TRS) is only 47 percent funded, I realize that even though the 'death spiral' incident is behind them, they are in terrible shape and extremely vulnerable to another market meltdown. They need major pension reforms on all fronts: contributions, benefits, retirement age and most importantly, pension governance.
I just suck.
That creature includes much more than fellow man. It includes all that is contained in this universe. It could be that dream home, that new car or long awaited caravan. We can do without those things for of what value will they be when you stand before the judgment seat of Christ?
I’m left wondering…why…no, really..why? Why, why, why?
Actually, you should always be careful of people looking over your shoulder. That shit is creepy. If you’re reading this over someone’s shoulder now, you’re a creep.
Gonna die on dead end street.
TGIF lovies!!
The world has water problem. Soon, those who control water control the world. I hope it would not happen very soon.
After canning, cooking, and packaging, the soup is ready to ship. Campbell Soup allows its customers to use their own trucks or trucking companies to transport the soup. Many other manufacturing companies will limit access to two or three trucking companies. CS does not sell directly to the grocery stores. Trucks deliver the pallets to distribution centers. Our carrots could end up in any of the eleven near-by states served by the Paris plant. We’re almost exactly in the middle of this territory which minimizes transportation costs for the customers.
an emergency when we can’t think about it!
Her beauty and innate sense of style? Well that’s a given surely?
But stopping now before Brayden's little ears get toooooo receptive is top priority.
November: *writes a short*
Flowers A-Z: O Is for Orchid. I love orchids so much. They’re the only plant that I seem able to keep alive for an extended period of time. I’m inspired to buy another one from the Charlottesville farmers’ market to put in our bathroom. (Design Sponge)
“Right now, individuals are trumping the general populace at large and I find that, frankly, offensive and amoral,”says Snyderman.
I found myself struggling to recall Templeton’s practical advice a few mornings ago when I noticed that as I went to update the file name of my current dissertation chapter with the date, I’m approaching the six month mark; that is, I’ve been working on this chapter, off and on, for nearly six months. Excuse me while I rummage in the pantry for my emergency chocolate supply; I’m dangerously approaching the depression point. The draft is, as a dearly-beloved professor of mine once described the difficult draft, “like a very slow, painful bowel-movement”. Normally recalling this analogy makes me laugh; that day it just induced the urge to cry, vomit, and cry some more. (I once described the process of writing a dissertation as like being pregnant; all I do is eat and cry). Obviously, I realized I needed some fresh inspirational material. I turned to Anne Lamotte’s visualization technique in “Shitty First Drafts” of taking all of the negative voices in my head, pretending they were mice, dropping them into a jar with a nifty little volume control, and pressing mute. This unfortunately proved ineffective. I took a walk to the lady’s room to relieve a non-existent urge to pee; I coaxed my guidedog outside for a few minutes of fresh air (as it turned out, he didn’t need to pee either). I returned to my desk and checked the word count on my document; I still had 130 words left to write before I could close the document for the day. I considered calling my boyfriend until, in a horrifying, Bridget Jones-worthy realization, I remembered that I don’t in fact have one. I rolled my shoulders a few times, said a quick prayer, put fingers to keyboard, and tried again. It was Friday, I told myself; if I could just write 130 more words, I could move on to bigger and better things. I tried Anne Lammote’s visualization technique again; no go. I tried pretending that if I wrote my 200 words, I would win a coffee date with the celebrity of my choice. This only inspired unproductive fantasies and a humiliating imagined scenario involving an uncoordinated me spilling hot cappuccino in Colin Firth’s lap. Closing my eyes and massaging my temples, I waited patiently for the word fairy, who had apparently gone on holiday. Well, I’d just have to manage without her prolific pixie dust then. Laboriously I began to type, experiencing a sensation not unlike that of upending a nearly empty ketchup bottle to squeeze out what little there is left. I typed; I paused; I squeezed; I typed again; lather, rinse, repeat. OK, so this description is conjuring up the bowel movement analogy yet again, but I think my visualization is equally colorful and perhaps slightly less offensive.
“Virtually all of the 10,500 potential release sites have been at least partially characterized, approximately 46 percent have been fully characterized and regulatory decisions have been made for substantially fewer sites.” (Vol. 1, pg. 3-13).
The novel begins with an introduction from Isabel, in which she looks back to the year the plague came: 'We knew then that 1349 would be terrible. But nobody could have imagined quite how terrible it was going to be.' (So we do know that Isabel herself will survive.) After that, the story is told in the present tense. It begins on an ordinary day, a beautiful June morning: by the end of the morning, and the end of the chapter, the villagers have heard that the plague is close by. We meet Isabel's family as they awake: her much-loved stepmother Alice, her baby brother Edmund, nine year-old Ned, and little Margaret. There are two older brothers: Richard, who is married, and Isabel's favourite brother, Geoffrey, who is in a monastery. Her father is relatively well to do, but he still belongs to his lord, and has to work his land as well as his own. Sally easily sketches a picture of a hierarchical society where everyone knows his or her place and is confined to it.
A woman surrounded by family
P.A. Works has just released the first trailer for its next original anime, Tari Tari. Through this first trailer, we may have just caught a small glimpse of what looks tobe a slice of life anime, following the footsteps of P.A. Works’ previous successful slice of life original anime, Hanasaku Iroha.
It's supposed to be only crooks that the state has to hold in check through force. And these felons should not be able to count on silence and even acceptance from sections of the ruling elite and society at large.
Arachidyl Proprionate – A wax that can be from animal fat. Alternatives: peanut or vegetable oil.
In honor of the upcoming "baking" season, we are going to have another giveaway sponsored by Fisher Nuts!! Woo-hoo!
Again we have little context to be able to judge if this is a good or bad result for NAMA. If NAMA is indeed hounding developers and if the media image of widespread transfers is correct, and developers with €74bn of loans had a few billion of unencumbered assets to protect, then it somehow seems like a small number. In light of the TAIL transaction at Treasury Holdings which we learned about yesterday where €20m of shares were supposedly transferred to the founders of the company for what on the face of it appears to be well below value – disputed apparently by Treasury who seem to claim the transaction was at open market values – and two years after the transaction, NAMA has still not gone to the courts to reverse the transaction, despite referring to it in its affidavits as “a grave concern” and “making good of the financial damage caused to Treasury by the TAIL transaction has been a central requirement of NAMA at all material times” and “at no stage has NAMA accepted the propriety of what was done in the TAIL transaction” then you might indeed wonder if the €160m of reversed transactions is anything but a paltry start to reversing developer transfers.
So stop whining about the economy or your pending foreclosure — and smile, buddy, smile!
2 or more tags
judge in mine own conscience may best conduce to tend to the public weal
07/16 BUY XAUUSD 0.01 1203.05 08/06/2010 1206.09 +3.03
A big improvement for sure!
California is facing a $41 billion budget deficit.
our ride was about 45 minutes.
...nobody from round 'ere ever amounts to owt, unless they become a Premiership footballer or win the lottery. I'm only OK at football and don't play the lottery - so basically I'm fucked.
Back at the dentist’s office, the high-tech filter breaks down and The Tank Gang have escaped into the harbor, but realize they are confined to the bags of water that the dentist put them into when cleaning the tank.
“Our employers in shipbuilding before this major expansion had about 2,000 workers. With this major expansion, we’re talking, 3,000-3,500 just in Northeast Wisconsin,” said Rafn.
"You want to send someone in?" Mikk asks, which means he's saying, in Mikk-speak, that he's volunteering to go inside because he believes it crucial.
Every time I’ve been blessed with the opportunity to deliver a sermon, I’ve always taken compliments with a grain of salt. It’s not because I’m some kind of humble saint, unwilling to have praise heaped upon me for delivering a flawless message, but rather because it’s been in the friendly confines of my home church, campus ministry, or setting where the hearers are supposed to tell me what a good job I’ve done.
Of the 112 articles sitting in my “must read” folder, many relate to Da Silva Moore. With one or two exceptions with longer-term value, I propose to archive them all until there is something new and useful to say about this case. There is plenty else to write about.
Did I miss something? Leave me a comment!
What you are asking about, and it’s true, we have a lot of groups that we can’t identify in a town, and you know, I’ll say we can’t always… it’s an imperfect process… because we’re forced to… many times we know quite a lot about a group. Other times we don’t know much more, uh, other than a particular Klan group… What those basically are, those are state-wide units… that’s what those groups are… So, the Knights of the Ku Klux Klan might have a chapter in Harrison, Arkansas, they may have a chapter in another town, and so they might also have an Arkansas chapter, and in those cases, we don’t know where the chapter is.
and that included selling your finished items...
Anselme’s summoning was then complete, an air elemental emerging suddenly upon the field before immediately becoming a huge tornado of whirling winds! With the roar of howling currents the whirlwind tore swiftly across the battlefield, sweeping up countless skeletons in the blink of an eye as it began to skirt along the badly besieged eastern front–and whisking away the halfling mummy attempting to pursue Pandora still, though not before the drow had also been inflicted with its terrible disease.
p.s. 3 : Please don't give up because of the current pictures we are showing the world. We are still young and need a perfect timing to get the train back on track. Trust me, the captain will soon lead everyone to a better arena.
“We’ve been facing really enormous pressure for five or six weeks now,” Chalghoumi told reporters before Friday prayers. “We want peace, we want calm. These people aren’t welcome here.”
For more info, or to write your representative, click here. (That said, I am of the opinion that anyone who would put their name to bills like this doesn't care what you or I think. And I'm already seeing evidence of it, such as Lamar Smith stating that he's removed some of the more objectionable provisions of his bill... but if you read closer, you see that it HASN'T really removed then; he's just taking them out for "further study." Trust me... once the heat is off, they're going back in, and he and his fellow censors and would-be oppressors will represent the bill exactly as they wanted it to be in the first place. The only solution here is to GET RID OF EVERY SINGLE ONE OF THEM.)
Mark Strong …….. Sinestro
7:30 – The King Left, Drink Up Buttercup @ Mercury Lounge $10 (21+)
Now, as annoying as my Green Line train can be, I'm VERY lucky that my transit pass is only $59/month, and I won't be affected by the limit decrease. At least, it seems that way from the outset. But maybe some of my neighbors in Needham, wanting to avoid that extra bit of taxation, will switch and start taking the Green Line too, since their monthly commuter rail pass is $151/month. Or maybe some friends in Framingham will start driving to Riverside to escape their $210/month pass. Hey, let's throw in some extra passengers from Fitchburg or Worcester too, with their $250/month fee. Suddenly my already over-capacity train is feeling even more crowded. (Oh, and the MBTA is planning to, and should, increase its rates this summer, right?)
1 writhing
And you know what? I’m good with that.
* Vocals have only one sound (always the same for each one), except for the “U”, that is not pronunciated in the following cases: que qui gue gui.
Saute the onion and celery in the butter in a sauce pan until tender. Add the cans of vegetables. Season the soup with a teaspoon of sugar and half a teaspoon each of nutmeg, salt and pepper. Simmer around 30 minutes.
Witt also offers some revisionist history:
Grand Teton Brewing Co. Sweetgrass IPA
Applies
We will forever be Grateful for your courage
And never breathe a word about your loss;
I’ve been a very bad girl.
Flashback 2002: CBS News – Osama Suffering Kidney Failure Near Death! Good Morning America Learns That Osama Bin Laden is CIA Agent! Osama Bin Laden Was a Bush Business Partner & a CIA Asset aka Tim Osman ! The Bush Family And Bin Laden Family’s Business Connection! David Duke: The Insanity of Christian Zionism! The Hatred of Zionist Israelis Against Jesus Christ And Christians! Bin Laden Busiest Corpse in Show Business For Last 10 Years! Battlefield Bank: Weapons of Mass Financial Destruction! BBC: Al Qaeda Does Not Exist! James Corbett: Osama Bin Laden’s Death, Another Mass Psyop! Ex-ISI Chief Hamid Gul: Bin Laden Hoax to Expand War into Pakistan & Asia! This Could Be Start of World War 3!
A disease that's already killed a million bats in eastern North America has been found in a colony hibernating near Mattawa.
-chocolate chip cookie dough logs
In this case, the applicant filed the ’595 patent on July 18, 1995, as the U.S. national stage application of the original PCT application. "However," the court noted, "July 18, 1995 is not the "U.S. filing date" of the ’595 patent":
1/4 tsp ground red pepper
I’ve also started to get very bold and I want to do something that really makes a difference. My last blog suggested that the possibility of eradicating disease was just around the corner. And I’m sticking to that. And I’m telling anyone that will listen. I’m issuing a Wake Up Call for people to shed their limiting beliefs and start STEPping into their own greatness. I will be encouraging people to recognize what’s going on in their lives that is eating away at them, and to start dealing with those things now before they get the big wake-up call. I wish I had received this wake-up call before my disease gave me a big wake-up call. Having said that, my big wake up call could have been a lot worse.
I was fortunate enough to have what one might call a bit of a windfall and after the essentials had been dealt with I did find myself a little flush in the wallet area so I went shopping. I had decided last weekend that I would use this opportunity to upgrade and so I began to discuss my torch options with other users and did some research. I was pretty sure that i did not want to buy a Nortel Minor - a lot of folk have them and they are very good - but i wanted to not limit myself to melting soft glass as I quite fancy a foray into Boroscilicate in the future. Nortel produce several torches in their range beyond a Minor, and the Mega Minor is capable of melting boro (some minor users can work in small scale boro by adding a second oxycon), but again I wasn't overly convinced by it.
I've debated and debated with myself about whether or not to actually write those words in a post. But I've really found comfort in reading other bloggers' posts about their challenges ... knowing others experience similar difficulties and frustrations makes one, well ... feel a bit better. So I decided to share my photography challenges with you. Just in case it makes someone else feel even just a tiny bit better. Or, to at least give you all a little laugh. My behind-the-scenes secrets are about to be revealed!
1/2 red bell peppper, diced
I hand cut and hand weave each heart-in-hand motif.
Through a tremendous amount of effort, planning, maneuvering, and use of physics principles...David transported our new (to us) castle into the backyard for the girls.
Cloyingly, in business it appears to have lots to do with OBHS. There’s room to explore the city’s identity through other mirrors and charms, make that soon, make that comprehensive.
The memories I have with my grandmother to me are much more valuable, well to me. While some were cooking or quilting with their grandmothers I was being blinded and told to "stay right there, last picture I swear".
Economic and Political Empowerment.
Publication date: December 2011 272pp pbk 9781841138732 £65.00
Then it goes:
I also had a whole bunch of empty MAC products (my mum goes through the eyeliners like crazy) and I swapped them (see back to MAC) for this pink-red Creamsheen lipstick in Lickable. Since it's one of their Creamsheens, the formula is more moisturising, slightly glossy and adds a bright burst of colour. Yay. Not bad for a freebie.
I tend to think such decisions come more out of instinct than logic for the simple reason the circumstances seldom provide the prospective hero with the luxury of contemplating his or her options.
pepper torture, torture soup, torture stew, torture salad,
And, of course, Gibby’s foot massages. He has, according to Spencer, “the hands of a goddess”.
This is a good point to wash your container, if you haven´t done it allready. We worked with milk containers, actually, the wallets on the first pic were made in February, and I can guarantee you, it didn´t get stinky, because you can wash them pretty clean this way.
Back from the ranch. On the first day of our trip I wrote down almost two pages of wry observations for the blog, but by day 2, I was thinking, "blog? What blog?" Which is as good an indicator as any of my state of relaxation.
I have alternate worlds to keep me occupied when I don’t want to be in my current reality.
“These nuns and their leaders continued to bolster the reputation of the Roman Catholic Church even as it suffered one of its greatest scandals in the sexual abuse of schoolchildren by rogue priests and the cover-ups by diocesan authorities. . . .
And in other news …
As I sat down on the couch, my dad turned the TV on. We sat together watching the events unfold. We watched as they played and replayed the second plane crashing into the Twin Towers. We watched as the plane crashed into the Pentagon and as the news of the forth plane crashing in Pennsylvania was delivered. We watched as the towers came crashing down. Even as I watched, I don't think I understood the magnitude of it all. The lives that were lost. The number of people who lost loved ones. The efforts of the fireman, police, military, emergency workers, and your everyday, average person. I will never forget that day.
- pre-made hamburger patties and buns
I’m not out to make enemies here, so I’m not going to single out any particular stories for criticism. And before there are any accusations of sour grapes, I’ll mention that what’s prompted me to write this post are the results of a competition I didn’t even enter (although there are plenty of occasions when I’ve been annoyed at losing out to what I’d consider Bad Flash). I’m trying to be as objective as I can.
“There is a time for everything, and a season for every activity under heaven: …a time to weep and a time to laugh,
I didn't change anything significant from the two recipes I used, so I won't rewrite them here. You can find both at the links; use the Look Inside function on Amazon to search for the cashew ricotta recipe on Veganomicon (or buy the book already!)
On December second 2006, halfway through my senior year of college and just before my twenty-second birthday, writing " I just want to be with someone whose arms I am as excited to jump into as a pile of leaves fallen from a tree."
So that's all from me...going to have a bath and then catch up..
"Pulsar: The Ultimate Man of Adventure was an action figure for boys made by Mattel in 1976. Pulsar was a 14" action figure looked like a handsome middle aged man with short white hair. However once you opened his sweat suit top it revealed that his entire torso was clear plastic which allowed viewing of his internal organs. There was a button on his back that when depressed would make his lungs and heart pump and force simulated blood through some simulated arteries and veins in the body cavity."WTF?!?
Victoria Jaye BBC Vision. 86-90% of TV consumed is still live despite iPlayer’s exponential rise to 2% of viewing.
There are no signs of mandate changes, not even on the news,
I am not a Chinese girl, but I think Chinese girls have a lot of virtues that are under appreciated and these are but a sampling. Chinese women have been pushed into the background by men for as long as China has been Chinese. With times changing they are achieving more and more independence, it’s a slow change but if we don’t all blow up in 2012 I will be interested to see where the woman’s China is going.
At a most basic level, magnetic fields are produced only by electricity. So with new eyes we observe our Universe as electrically charged, electrically based and electrically-operated.
I am shown a picture of a waterfall gently trickling down with Divine white light, which I am feeling represents the beauty and gentleness inside of you, as well as a sign that things are flowing and in positive motion. Visualise white cleansing and healing light moving and flowing through you like a waterfall shower. Picture it flowing through you from your crown chakra (just above your head) right down
And merry go her moments, lulled and stilled in
Rita: "What happened to the kid?"
Happy second birthday to this blog! To mark the occasion I am kicking off a month of top fives – children’s authors list their personal playlists for all sorts of subjects.
Understand why I frown.
It's been pretty busy for me in the past few weeks, so I haven't been able to ride much. I was a bit sick over last weekend, and finally got to go ride again on Thursday.
El Libro De Piedra (Also known as The Book of Stone) is about a young girl named "Sylvia", she's a little nutcase because she does odd things and has an imaginary friend named "Hugo" who is just a statue. One day, Sylvia gets a new governess, she's a very sweet woman that believes Sylvia is not crazy but just very imaginative. Well, things get very strange when Sylvia's governess starts seeing a young boy walking outside at night and when she looses her precious jewel in the water near Hugo, it's brought back to her by someone at night. Sylvia's step mother is afraid of Hugo because she's also seen a boy walking outside at night, so why is Hugo walking outside all the time? He just plays with Sylvia a lot, they're friends and they care about each other very much. Later on in the movie we find out Sylvia practices black magic, she draws some sort of demonic signal with salt to bring her lizard back to life and she uses her doll as a voodoo doll to hurt her step mother, then Hugo is doing some bad things like scaring a dog to death and killing Sylvia's godfather by staring at him through a car mirror. In the end of the movie, Hugo is destroyed but that doesn't mean the magical book of stone he carries is gone, Sylvia holds the book for him and becomes a statue herself.. When we see her as a statue, it is just sooo creepy.
The Leftist-Islamic alliance will have profound consequences. Either they will defeat the West, or they will both go down in the fall. We never really won the Cold War as decisively as we should have done. Marxism was allowed to endure, and mount another attack on us by stealth and proxy. However, this flirting with Muslims could potentially prove more devastating to Marxists than the fall of the Berlin Wall.
Rating: 3.7/5 Action packed ending has me wanting more from this series!
Q065) Do you have any surprising skills?
If you are professing to be a child of God, but sin comes floating out of your life- curse words come easily out of your mouth- evil sensual desires occupy your ambitions, and trying to be like the world dominates your life-style- these are all signs of delusion; True repentance through Christ will deliver us- set us completely free from these things.
4) Keep it Simple!
What a relief it will be for both Guides and aspirant, for the Masters and the disciples by that time. Yet, no matter if Earth will be freed of Dark beings, as a matter of self-discipline, it is better to follow security protocols. Information that shouldn’t be openly shared should be kept secret.
*Religion: She has decided that she does want to be confirmed this year. I haven't figured out a plan really for September yet. Mass, of course, and I think I might work through the grade 4 book of Faith and Life with her. It's got nice, simple foundational things in it. I need to check the contents for the grade 5-8 books and maybe see about getting some others to use during the year. Due to scheduling conflicts, she might not be able to participate in all of the sessions our parish runs for those seeking Confirmation, so I definitely need to do some things on the side. And I'm not thrilled about the fact our parish's preparation for Confirmation is pretty much a session each week for six weeks in a row--that doesn't feel like much of a preparation to me. So, we'll use the year to cover topics, questions, etc., through other resources than just the preparation sessions. Of course, encouraging daily Bible reading is always good! :)
She also adds that we should walk the plot barefoot from time to time and suggests standing in different places first thing in the mornings and pouring water over our bodies (before showering). Also, soaking our feet in the evenings and using the soak water to water the plants. These may seem strange suggestions to some, but if you’re familiar with the body’s natural cleansing methods, it is actually very practical. We’re just talking the sweat (which carries toxins from our body) and offering it to the soil for the plants to soak up. They will use this information to formulate their fruits. She also gives practical advice on bee keeping, which I’m very excited to try someday when we are in a long term residence. The earth and all living things in it are our friends, are here to assist us. All we need is to re-remember how to let them, to communicate with them, to be a friend back. Life is not this artificial world we have built and allowed to confine us. Life is in the natural world. All that matters can be learned and obtained there.
One of the better remembered aliens, because of his glowing eyes (unfortunately he got dropped for the 1997 Special Edition version...)
Lacking the academics to do so, there is not a lot I can say technically about their vocals. I can tell you I own every CD except their latest which I purchased last night. But I will tell you this. Sitting in a theatre listening to them live was sheer magnificence in motion.
That is, until he signed a bill on August 19 that one columnist described as touting “the idea of raising your electric rates to place windmills in the ocean off New Jersey.” In this case the windmill would be 75 feet taller than the Statue of Liberty! None of the residents of Union Beach want a windmill no matter how far out in the Atlantic it’s built.
The Death Knight was my first character to level 85, and the first I wanted to take to raids. I also now have a Hunter and Druid at 85, and the Paladin, Warlock, and Priest are stuck at 80, with a shamble of Shamans and others throughout the 30s to 70s. In 2008 I said I’d not ever have a Hunter and now its 85 – the game changes you.
From my storybooks(this is an obvious one):
It wasn't much of a nest, as nests go
We've traded up to a 4-year-old fifth wheel RV pulled by a 13-year-old pickup. We're selling the farm. We've given away almost everything useful or beautiful that we owned. And we've sent a whole lotta junk to its final resting place. It'll be a challenge to be as frugal as before with a minimalist attitude toward property. This is the first time we've surrendered all of our precious junk, which we often mined for solutions instead of buying new things. But being on the road for months has gotten us used to living without stuff, and it's downright liberating when you really start pitching all the crap that's been collecting dust in corners and harboring spiders in storage rooms for years.
Realising this potential, the Government, through various initiatives under the Government Transformation Programme (GTP) has mapped out a set of deliverables for the Tourism Ministry in order to stimulate sustainable tourism as the nation races to achieve its high-income status by 2020.
Story: Gray
This is what I was pondering today as I did my 4 miler through town... I think it's pretty easy to be contemplative today given that it's the 9 year anniversary of 9/11. After watching some tributes this morning and shedding some tears in memory of the events of that day, I decided to go out and enjoy the beautiful fall New England weather. Plus, I had to run. :) No choice when you're training for a race!
to go along with the endings and goodbyes,
Welcome to the Jungle Baby Shower review! We had such a blessed time on Saturday. The house was filled with a wonderful combination of family and friends. Healthy Chick, mother-to-be, proclaimed the pom pom filled chandelier was "the bomb." Fun-Sized Chick was invaluable with the games and extra helping hand. My favorite things, were the cupcakes and "Poof-elier." It was a lot of work, but it turned out beautifully! Warning, long post ahead!
I'd really appreciate the help. Salamat!
And the Quran thing will just not die. Apparently, any politician who says Islam is a Religion of peace “cannot be trusted.” I’m sorry, what? Jesus Christ! I am so done talking about this. I mean, Done! Doney, Done Done! I have nothing else to say… EXCEPT this!
An infallible reason to live all by itself
the depth of the verruca was revealed to be somewhat alarming
Format: Audio
Well today was interseting, we've started speaking 100% ukrainian all day everyday and I can tell its going to be super hard for me cause the only person I can talk to in ukrainain is Elder Flint! and he knows even less then I do! these next two weeks are going to be rough. I'm also starting to feel old here cause everyone is looking to me for how to study better or how to teach better and I have no Idea but I always try to teach them how to do it and for some reason I can always feel the spirt teaching me while I teach them its really cool
It's Stiletta! Jonah pulls his pistol and demands that she stay back since she's some kind of machine that he saw blasted apart. She says that whatever he saw, it wasn't her. She kneels down and fills a canteen with water, stating that she has no idea how Jonah Hex got to be so ignorant, but that in the holocaust of 2045, all open water was contaminated to the point of one taste kills a man. She takes a wafer, splits it into quarters and drops one in the canteen, explaining that it is a soames and that one soames purifies one gallon of water.
We see here the introduction of the “book you have written” which will become known as the Book of Life. Moses begs for the Lord to forgive the sin of Israel. What does Moses ask the Lord to do if he is unwilling to forgive Israel? How does this show him to be a mediator between the people and God? Would Jesus do differently? (“But now, please forgive their sin – but if not, then blot me out of the book you have written.” (Exodus 32:32 NIV) Moses shows himself a mediator because he is willing to give up everything for the people. Jesus puts it this way: “Greater love has no one than this, that he lay down his life for his friends.” (John 15:13 NIV))
What do you think of the wide pink polka dot ribbon on the right-hand side? The dots will go well with the theme, I think. Maybe I’ll also look in my box of silk wedding flowers, put a few pastel petals together with a pink brad. Now that I have a good idea of what I will use, I’ll put them all together. The sentiments were stamped using the Versa Mark sticky pad and black embossing powder to make the words stand out nicely.
starring Ben Affleck, Jon Hamm, Rebecca Hall,
Brown velvet jacket with brooch, FANG. Red and orange tweed pants, Moda International. White lace tank, George ME. Orange scarf with embroidery, beading, and paillettes, India. Brown booties, Style & Co. Topaz-colored drop earrings and necklace, gifted.
“I’m not running because I’m transgender,” said Mr. Wymore, 50, who was born female but now, after testosterone therapy and top surgery, identifies as transgender. But, he said, that “doesn’t mean that being transgender doesn’t bring a certain perspective.”
Join us Thursday, March 29th at 7:00 p.m. EDT (Eastern time) as we chat with debut author Elisa Ludwig on Pretty Crooked! Her awesome editor Glaudia Gabel, author of Romeo & Juliet & Vampires, will be here also, chatting with us about working with Elisa on Pretty Crooked, and giving us the low down on her new YA! You can set a reminder at the bottom of the chat window.
So, what did I have on hand?
About a year and a half later, I can definitely report that the freedom is "working" for us. My kids are happy and healthy and fun, and we have wonderful relationships with each other. That doesn't mean it's always easy or that it always looks pretty, though. Some days the kids make choices that seem to be extreme and, if taken out of context, would probably make us look like "bad" parents.
Thank you for visiting :-D Cindi
and then burn the leftover trash.
I had many moments that literally took my breath away while reading as I was like YES that's is it exactly and other times that brought tears to my eyes as I thought yes someone else knows what this is like.
The ruling likely won’t be the end of the matter. A federal appeals court in Washington, D.C., arrived at a different conclusion in similar case, saying officers who attached a GPS to the car of a suspected drug dealer should have sought a warrant.
Department of Health
(Hasan Salaam & Rugged N Raw)
I am freaking the f**k out! I don’t even want to think about it at ALL! I kinda feel like this kid having a breakdown of some sort.
1. The author has done good research of the epic. If you don’t give the prologue a miss, you will see how much the author has put in on this subject. His detailed analysis of the Indian epic is commendable.
I was at a restaurant yesterday with my husband and 9 month old. She sat in her highchair and squealed and whapped her arms as if trying to fly. There were a couple of lovely women sitting next to us and she obviously struck a cord with them. One of the women gushed over her and asked us if she ever cried (HA! we both replied with “oooooh yeah!” and laughed inside at the memories of our colicky little turkey). She looked at us and said that her children were grown up now and she still remembers them as babies, and that we were to enjoy every minute.
Anyhow! Sure hope you can join us at Pink Ink and Simply Betty!!
1/2 teaspoon freshly ground black pepper
Do you know how hard it is to get the ends of yarn through a small hole. The hole became a big hole...hence the brads. This was the end result.
I've seen a lot of gradient colored fondant cakes recently, and they are so pretty! Making one of those is on my eventual "to do" list, but for today, I borrowed the idea for the green fondant in Tink's skirt. I used three shades, though I think a really beautiful gradient cake should have four or five shades. Next time! (The bottom tier looks white because of the lighting, but it's actually light green.)
My verdict: Brilliant, definite attention-getter
I have been so busy this past week with my outdoor project aka garden/back yard that I only found very little time to create and I must say I was also too drained in the evenings to sit down and try to create but I am really happy so far with how much I have gotten done and I thought I would share my success.
I. LOVE. IT.
Of the celebrities topping my list is Jim Cuddy. He is my favourite singer. Then there was Hockey Night in Canada host, Ron McLean, Rob Higgins of Dearly Beloved(and nephew of Rush's Geddy Lee), Tyler Stewart of Bare Naked Ladies, Barney Bentall (and his son Dustin who I've seen perform with Blue Rodeo and he's great) So when I saw the opportunity for tickets to this event I was on it! Jim with a stick(STOP that..I mean hockey stick) would be a huge thrill!
A friend of mine is having twins... a boy and a girl. I'm throwing her shower for her. After surfing for a bit I chose the Perfect Pair theme... and these are the invites...
I lead a full and happy life, have great friends and a loving family, I do work that I love, but sometimes, just sometimes, it would be lovely to have a man in my life. I’ve probably watched too many ghastly Jennifer Aniston films, but I live in hope of being swept off my feet by a George Clooney look-alike who treats me like a goddess and worships me daily.
“Live Simply”
Thanks Jane for taking time to write and share your incredibly creative pet solution!
On the way back home from the airport I tuned into Radio 2 to discover some brass band murdering Jeff Wayne's War of the Worlds. That tune just wasn't meant to be performed by a brass band - it's simply too fast.
My work is usually done in series, responding to some issue that I'm exploring using a wide variety of media. My latest series, "Visions", references the poem "Kubla Kahn"in which Coleridge describes a savage place, with holy and enchanted caverns, wall, towers and a sacred river where "The shadow of the dome of pleasure floated midway on the waves." These haunting images of submerged architectural passageways, lit from within, reflect the branches of trees and illuminate floating leaves and flowers. This image, Holy and Enchanted, exists both as a lenticular print and as a monoprint on fresco.
That whips around the posts of my gate
This is where most of my mornings begin. I usually end up here around 7:30am and for the most part beat the rush. It’s funny how you start to see the same people each day, however no one talks because its just too early for words to be spoken.
The acting ranges from passable to amateurish. Over and above this, many fine performers in the show are miscast. For a show that’s ostensibly about murderous roving bands of S&M Amazons, there seem to be no genuine (or even apparent) bad girls in the bunch. For example, Elizabeth Stewart as Electra, the leader of a gang known as the Furies, is a terrific dancer, and a fine actress. But she has the misfortune (here) of possessing a willowy, graceful stage presence, radiating sensitivity and intelligence…more Mary Steenburgen than Tura Santana. Most of her fellow gang members are likewise far too sweet for their roles, more suited for a Girl’s Volleyball team than the Roller Derby that is required here. The exceptions are Leasen Beth Almquist, whom as the evil Queen relishes her role archly, and her three Go-Go Boy minions (Brian Rubiano, Freddy Mancilla, Preston Bruger) who treat their brief moment in the sun with 500% enthusiasm.
I just sent an email to my editor that included the line 'the ethnicity of the ostrich is not recorded', and spent the afternoon doing picture research to brief an illustrator who needs to show an ant with cordyceps (parasatic fungus) growing out of its head, one of Damien Hirst's sliced cows, and a Timurid war elephant. Actually, he'd got the war elephant spot on.
Just wanted you to know that there won't be a post tonight, but I'll try to have it up tomorrow night. Jay has been in the hospital since Sunday, and I just brought him home this evening. I've been so busy running between home and the hospital that I haven't had the time (or honestly, the desire) to create. I do have things to post, but was just too tied up with all that is going on to get it published tonight. I hope you will indulge me an extra night. Nothing too serious with Jay. . .just another severe bladder/urinary tract infection. With MS, this takes him almost to a weak, almost helpless situation. So, that's the reason for not getting to your blogs this week. . .I'm so sorry I didn't get to visit. But I'll catch up, I promise. No need to comment on this post. Don't want to have you comment on this one and then on tomorrow's. Just wanted you to know what is going on and why there wasn't a post. Thanks for your understanding. . .
Now to find a sassy long cardigan, that is not black.
* Any CD, DVD or resource from the HeidiSongs catalog, up to $20 credit toward any product*
Shes such a sweet doll, so much fun! She loves CINDERELLA right now, I love how she says, "Rella purtty Rella"
8:30- Heath gets off his call and I'm downstairs on the couch on the iPad. We use this time to get caught up on DVR'd shows or just watch whatever is on. We very rarely watch anything live!
Wisconsin (LQ: 1.85; 2001-11 Job Change: -21%)
slashed down 50%!
Nothing special, then. If there had been no motion at all, Rel would have worried, but wherever the Wilder was, it wasn’t powerful enough to manage negation. Instead, it was breaking the wind’s motion up into eddies too small to pick up a hair. It was the trick most Wildren used. On a good day, with a fresh head on his shoulders, Rel might even be able to manage it himself.
Google is increasingly developing services to let consumers store their personal information, from digital music to photos, on remote internet servers and access the data any time with any device, such as smartphones, tablets and desktop computers.
My son's second grade teachers put on a Longhorn market every year where kids "make" a good then they get to 'buy' and 'sell' their goods to each other at the market. Honestly, I was kind of dreading this project because I knew we had to make 24 of whatever Reed's 'good' was going to be.
Recent events in my hometown has changed my views entirely. The world of motorcyclists are a caring and supportive group. Saturday night, after a night of motorcyclists' fundraising activities, the organizers of the spent the night in renting RV's on site to keep from having to drive home after cleaning up. The next morning, 5 of the organizers were found dead from carbon monoxide. The RV's faulty venting system, allowed the carbon monoxide to enter their RV and kill them in their sleep. The people who died were sons and daughters, brothers and sisters and most of all, they were mothers and fathers to a total of 12 children. TWELVE children lost their parents by a silent killer.
Sure, right now they look like this:
The ‘positive illusion’ theory usually starts at the beginning of a relationship, the falling in love stage, if you will but throughout the relationship the positive illusion may become more prominent when trying to figure out if your partner is ‘The One.’ When one looks at their partner they try to minimise any flaws they may have, in the hope of achieving security in their relationship.
Card Stock: White, Bashful Blue, Wild Wasabi, Rose Red, Wild Wasabi & Bashful Blue dsp from the designer series paper stack
She barely had the energy to cry to herself, but it was the only comfort left to her. The steam from her face was the only warmth she felt. It was the only thing alleviating the overwhelming sense of being fed up. It was bad enough that Jack was pushing her to have an abortion. Now she was hounded by unrelenting nausea. She could not see herself living like this for six weeks.
Rebecca Kamm talks to Harville Hendrix, who claims to have solved the mystery of how to live happily ever after.
Kimbra, a singer from Melbourne has won the International Songwriting Competition with her song ‘Cameo Lover’.
The whole process took 30 mins or pain. In the end she asked me HOW SOON was I due to see my doctor? SO something is wrong but no-one will tell me what. Hopefully the doctor will have the results in the next 24hrs and she will call me in to tell me the good/bad news.
Jonathan Schaech is no Patrick Swayze. Nor is Jake Busey a Ben Gazzara or whoever he's supposed to be here. You'd expect an appearance at least by Terry Funk, but no. Not even the ghost of Sam Elliott could've kept this out of DTV purgatory (EDIT: no, Sam Elliott is not dead as of this posting - I'm referring to his character in Road House. Relax. Jeez.)
I got this jacket as part of the H&M Conscious Collection which came out in May. I've worn it so much it's still a bit dirty around the edges. They were so gracious to send me to Coachella, dress me in head-to-toe H&M, and provide me with my very own driver, Moe. I'll never forget it.
There on the journey, on the trail came darker shades of dark,
(Buschenschank owners in front of CB6 Permit and License Committee last night)
Written by Jonny Zucker. Illustrated by Jan Barger. Ages 4-8.
Eating crow is my favorite pastime…so…to everyone whom I badgered yesterday for purchasing stock on 6/9, congratulations on your copious profits from today’s advance. I admit, while things looked grim after yesterdays reversal, I didn’t have a strong feeling about the market continuing to decline.
“The decline in batteries is a major factor that makes us susceptible to diseases. The cells have more energy and live longer,” he said. In addition, reversatrol contributes to longevity by mimicking the effects of diet and exercise.
We have seen how strong Shankar’s control over his nerves was when he faced lions in the past. His nerves didn’t fail him that night either.
A friendly fox approaches, how cute! Smart people love ALL animals unlike the BARBARIANS who hunt and kill them!
Could it be that, the SSPX will actually do the whole Chruch a favour by staking the claim for a more robust, clear, intelligible Theology? The result of this may well be a clearer understanding of the nature of the priesthood and the papacy. This must be a good thing. They may find they have new friends in very diverse corners of the Church.
So please now your numbers, know your family medical history. My mother made sure me and my sister knew ours and I'm going to make sure my boys know theirs. It's our first defense in helping ourselves stay healthy! Remember, talk to your family and find out your numbers, I know many of you have little ones to think of. We need to stay healthy for them! Now go and have that talk, you'll feel better that you did.
— Henry David Thoreau
Gothy, moody, and a chronic cutter, but her dad was in the military and her mom was a raging lush who almost burnt their house down, so can you really blame her? Then her gay best friend tried to use her as his beard instead of coming out of the closet. She also had ambitions to be a journalist. Over the years she got less gothy and started dating her hot college newspaper editor when she went to University, but then he cheated on Ellie with her very own mentor. In typical spurned girl fashion she got drunk and proceeded to call now-former mentor a slut at a public Q&A. Awesome sauce. Ellie was last seen frolicking in Hollywood and running away from her problems of dealing with her dad’s PTSD, but in the end, she made amends with her parents.
Related Posts:
Lately, I’m very addicted to this 70s song. I’ve been listening to this song for entire month. I used to get bored easily after listening the same song for weeks. But some of the oldies are really good. Old yet still New.
You should give Chris' break a chance next time he has one. It's always fun and you never know what you'll add to your collection. Thanks Chris!
Scooping Up Story Elements by Tonya of Super Second Graders: "This is a fun way for students to pick story elements to plan out a story. Students will pick a card from characters, setting, and plot and record then on the recording sheet. Students will use the chosen element to create a story. Students will have a blast getting to create fun and whimsical stories. " (1-4)
Anyway, this one guy's Forever Alone was, "Every night I broadcast myself playing Starcraft but no one ever watches."
Yep. That was the sound of me running smack into that wall. No, I’m not talking about writers block. I am still writing every day. Rain or shine, I put my but in the chair and I type because that’s my job. I’m talking about an emotional wall. One that makes me feel less optimistic about the world, my work and my life. The wall is tall and dark and really, really tall and when I think about having to scale it, I want to sit down on the ground and cry. Does that sound girly? Probably? But I’m a girl so I’m allowed.
There are, arguably, hundreds of additional traffic safety issues that deserve our attention (i.e. roundabouts, automated enforcement, advanced telematics to monitor more safety issues than speed alone, congestion management, 511 service utilization, etc.); however, it all comes down to tough choices.
Holland is currently leading the world in the production of artificial meat, and the Dutch government has put a huge amount of money into the research.
(the rest of it was delivered in french and translated for me, so am not sure of it)
I also had a small problem with the ending. I don't want to reveal too much, and this is purely my opinion, but I felt like Jackson's last decision went completely against all the things he learned in the past. Again, as far as that goes, it's merely that I wasn't crazy about the direction the story took but that's what happened and I can respect it. It's not going to keep me from reading the next book in the series and I feel like with more practice under her belt, the author is really going to be able to make something special.
We went to the Jacquemart-Andre museum in the 8th arrondissement for the Caillebotte brothers exhibit. I don't know if I spelled that museum name correctly, and quite frankly it's too hot to look things up, so it's going to stay that way.
I've never mentioned the part of the south Belle is from.
However, if you are interested in trying it out, I am of the opinion that heart is a good starting point. The taste is quite gentle, and the texture is conventional enough - some may even prefer it to meat. I've had chicken heart before, which I found to be quite delicious. This is my first experience with lamb heart, and I feel equally positive about it. Lamb heart, when raw, has a fairly rich, fleshy scent. When cooked, it has a pleasantly mild taste of lamb and a tender texture. Other than a stir-fry like this, I can also see myself throwing it into a pho or a curry laksa!
Life, as I know it right now, sucks.
Several years ago, I heard the story of Larry Walters, a 33-year-old man who decided he wanted to see his neighborhood from a new perspective. He went down to the local army surplus store one morning and bought forty-five used weather balloons. That afternoon he strapped himself into a lawn chair, to which several of his friends tied the now helium-filled balloons. He took along a six-pack of beer, a peanut-butter-and-jelly sandwich, and a bb gun, figuring he could shoot the balloons one at a time when he was ready to land.
Mike Ashley has endured a troubled time as Newcastle United’s owner; accused of not conducting due diligence before purchasing the Club, criticised for his sackings of managers and recently hammered for the renaming of St James’ Park. But is it time we all recognised the fantastic work Ashley has done in Toon town?
I’m sorry I let you down. I’m sorry I caused you damage.I took you for granted, picked you up, and then threw you to the floor. I know you’re heartbroken, bruised and emotionally drained. If you’d let me, I’d ease your pain. If you’d let me, I’d make you smile once more. You’re shutting me out and it’s killing me. Please do find it in your heart to forgive me; I know you would.
Stanza six. The great confession rings out again, and builds through the ages with intensity and strength; “This is the Christ, the Son of the living God! He is the Father’s Son who brings peace between God and man. By His death, He has destroyed death, making us whole and removing the strangling malice of the devil, the corrupted sinful flesh, and death’s cold tomb. Where O death is your victory? Where O death is your sting? You are abandoned, O ills of flesh and soul. You are bound in the tomb, conquered and left behind in your own demise by the Savior of the Nations who has come.
'We demonstrate for the first time a robust association between cultural values of individualism–collectivism and the serotonin transporter gene,' said Joan Chiao, from the department of psychology at Northwestern University.
Tammy got a phone call a few months ago from a company calling themselves Yellow Pages saying that they had a refund for us. Before she could ask any questions they informed her that I had signed up for advertising services (we're sitting on a domain name for a possible side business when we're retired) from them but that I was canceling the remainder of the services and that they needed to know where to send the $500. They asked her a series of questions and recorded her answers before transfering her to another telemarketer who began to explain the contract she'd just entered into. Say what? Tammy made it clear to them that she didn't sign up for anything and called them on the scam they were engaged in.
so head over there to enter!!
Brittni and I went to visit Rebecca's Junior High School. It was VERY different from Britt's school. For starters, it has electricity! And thus, a copy machine! There was a gated and locked fence all around the school. Someone had to get the key to let us in. I guess that solves the problem of students trying to ditch! English is ONE of the many language spoken in SA, and is the language classes are taught in. I was impressed with how well the students spoke- they showed us around the school and answered all our questions. The students were very loud, wild, and & rambunctious- The complete opposite of Malawian students!
Today I had the luck of spotting a HUGE Back to School sale at Things From Another World with many comics at 60% off, so I was able to get seven books for just $45.00 (plus free shipping to boot!) If you like comic books, I recommend you check it out while it lasts.
The Deep Impact spacecraft, which studied periodic comet 9P/Tempel 1 in 2005, will examine 103P/Hartley 2 during the period of September 5 to November 25, 2010, as part of the EPOXI (Extrasolar Planet Observation and Deep Impact Extended Investigation) mission. The closest approach occurs on November 4, when the minimum distance to the comet will be only 620 miles (1000 kilometers). The spacecraft will use two telescopes with digital color cameras and an infrared spectrometer. The latter instrument will determine the chemical composition of outbursts of gas from the comet’s nucleus.
So I had just one full day in Maine. We went to Camden, a lovely coastal town, and hung out with Jim (one of my three uncles) and his girlfriend. If you only have one day to do Maine, this wouldn't be a bad way to spend it - lobster roll and beer at Bayview Lobster Company on the wharf, perfect view of Camden Harbor, strolling around the quaint shopping district, another beer at Camden Deli on their rooftop deck - another fantastic view.
I originally thought I'd use Tanya's box for my class, but then decided I'd try my hand at making a closed box version. I made up my own printable template to make construction quicker & was excited it turned out as I wanted, so the card could be printed on my printer.
SECTION 1. Judges: who may take part. — All matters submitted to the court for its consideration and adjudication will be deemed to be submitted for consideration and adjudication by any and all of the justices who are members of the court at the time when such matters are taken up for consideration and adjudication, whether such justices were or not members of the court and whether they were or were not present at the date of submission; . . . .
As for Tyrion Lannister and Jon Snow – they are two of the biggest outcasts we get from the first year. The former being a dwarf and brother of incestuous duo Cersei and Jaime Lannister while the latter the bastard son of Ned Stark embarking on a service to the Wall. They’re both characters who are easy to care about due to their own compassionate natures and steely determination but between the two of them; it’s painfully easy to see why Tyrion has struck a chord with so many fans.
So our brewing will now be at his schedule. He's offered the use of his place anytime I want, which I appreciate, but I will never take up him up on the offer. It's his property, his shed, his house, yada yada yada.
imposition of unearned guilt, and the evocation of unwarranted
The first few sections establish how SOA architectures relate to their earlier counterparts (such as distributed components, applications and integration). It also illustrate how SOA architectures tend to differ somewhat in scope by being fundamentally concerned with creating a coherent ‘bigger picture’.
So to the giveaway....Thank you to everyone that commented. All names including the one's that commented via, Facebook and Twitter were put into a hat and the winner picked out was (a facebook name)...
As some of you mentioned, the downside to the bumGenius AIO diapers that I got is that they don't grow with the baby. I knew this when I ordered them but decided to try them out anyway. I couldn't commit to ones that grew with baby because I seriously was so overwhelmed! The stuffing, the snaps, velcro, became too much for me to bear at the time, so I went with the AIO.
Do you feel alone
My last semester in law school, I decided to take a ... well, let's call it what is was, shall we, it was a fluff class.
is the last thing I want to do when I get home.
2010.08.17 Somalia Mogadishu 1 2 A civilian is killed when Mujahideen toss a grenade at a police station.
“One day sexy, you and I will see who is stronger. When that day comes you will change your mind and be with me.” I barley have time to move as he leans in to kiss me.
To this point plus many other cases in the Bible, I can see the deep revelation God gave the founder of this ministry concerning the GRACE. I can see the power of the grace.
To make it even more confusing, New York also had a Century Theatre on the other side of Columbus Circle that was demolished in the 1930s. Hopefully I've gotten these theaters all straightened out!
if you could only see / the beast you’ve made of me / i’ve held it in but now it seems you’ve set it running free / screaming in the dark / i howl when we’re apart / drag my teeth across your chest to taste your beating heart
Let’s not be juvenile and insinuate that every massacre throughout history has a connection to psychiatric drugs because that is certainly furthest from the truth. But based of significant studies, research, and history there is a very strong correlation to not dispute this information. So, let’s examine some of these violent, tragic incidents and whether psychiatric drugs had an influence.
These workers also had a bit more disposable income and were increasingly adventurous. In response to this, the cha chaan tengs gave them the chance to try exciting new dishes, incorporating different western influences into their menus. Dishes like spam sandwiches and spaghetti were served to please more adventurous eaters.
E.g. pay for a weekend trip. Or go to a very fancy restaurant. Or whatever you like. A that year for year, without any effort later!
Didn't do anything that I had planned this weekend. But oh well.... Spent the weekend by myself cleaning and stuff like that. I love it when I can mark off all of the items off my 'to do list' and I did that.
Wow, that was a buzz kill. Here’s a bit of the madness I’ve been writing on a regular basis
Every ounce of her petite
When the chance came for a quick escape, even for an hour, I took it! Mitch and the kids were looked after by family & my brain needed respite for what was to come next...
Well, the Ferry Family decided to take a last minute weekend road trip and packed up on Friday… so, the drawing for the Sprig Toys Sand Truck got put on a back burner until today. More on the road trip later…
Hephzibah Anderson, Bloomberg Businessweek
I just watched Derrick Rose (6-3, 190) “throw” the Sixers’ Thaddeus Young (6-8, 220) to the floor as Rose was trying to fight over what by that point had become a laughably illegal screen set by the Sixers forward. The whistle blew immediately – foul on Rose…of course. On the replay, Rose probably fouled Young on his way around, getting his arms around Young’s waist and using them to leverage himself over the screen, but in no way had Rose done anything that should have so much as moved the much larger Young.
7) Everybody who is not in a fraternity lives in the dorms, even grad students. All roommates dislike each other at first sight, but become bestest best buddies by mid-semester. (In the unlikely event that your roommate befriends you immediately, you should seek psychiatric help, because there is a good chance that you are actually schizophrenic and have hallucinated him.)
into bigger trouble.
"The most dangerous moment comes with victory." Napoleon Bonaparte
I recently tried a Schwelmer Pils, and in it found exactly the beer I wish was readily available in sixers here. It would have been perfect last night. It is light, but wonderful rich with flavor and aroma. The nose is floral almost to the point of being perfumy; I even detect a note of honey, which enhances the overall summery vibe. The malt is perfectly clean (it's a German beer, after all), but there is just the smallest touch of biscuity, honeyish sweetness. The hops are not strong but varied, with herbal notes, peppery spice, and that floral quality evident in the noes. It is crisp and dry at the finish, which is where the beer earns its hot-weather stripes. Heavier beers end with a fuller note--sometimes resinous, if they're hoppy--and this does not cool and refresh.
jimmy: I object. I think I look like an undercover cop at glastonbury.
My daughter went through the same thing with a boy on the school bus when she was little. She didn’t want to make a big deal out of it, but the boy wouldn’t leave her alone. I called the bully’s mother to tell them about the incident. What started as a gesture to clear the air ended up with the mother accusing my daughter of being the bully. I could see that I wasn’t getting anywhere and started taking my daughter to school. As I see it, she wasn’t running away, just coming up with a solution.
He's the only one that can help me and give me the strength to carry on ...
We go on a farm tour.
I would like to thank 'Knit Today' very much indeed for this fabulous write up and for allowing our Group to be 'Club of the Month!'. My 'SIBOLETTES' will be extremely pleased and I know I am!
Many people believe repent means to say, “I am sorry”. However, it goes far beyond saying sorry. Repentance typically precedes a spiritual encounter with the living God. A heart is convicted and convinced that changes need to come about.
What I also found is that when Janie was describing how she felt, it seemed a whole lot more real, because Darer Littman suffered with bulimia herself. There's something that seems more believable when you know the author has been through what the main character is fgoing through, in comparison to an author researching and trying to get into a sufferer's head - not that I'm knocking it. It just felt at times like Darer Littman was speaking herself through Janie, and that made it hit home just a little bit more - Purge isn't autobiographical, but it's not just a story, some of those feelings are real.
When we got home I carefully selected a place on the bookshelf to store my new purchases. I didn’t want to flip through them yet, I wanted to be able to open the first one when I found out I was pregnant for the time and I would open the book and devour its information about what I would be experiencing over the next 9 months.
I’ve tried to work on it over the years, but I am coming to accept the fact that I will more likely take longer to get an organizing task done because I tinker, putter, reminisce, or just plain dawdle. Hi. I’m Heather and I get side-tracked while organizing.
"Great news for Zappaphiles!"..."If you ever dug Zappa, you don't want to miss the GrandMothers of Invention."..."They are THE authentic live version of Zappa's music."..."This isn't just another comeback, this is the reincarnation of the Mothers of Invention!"..."From Zappa's mid to late 70's Mothers bands, the GrandMothers are touring the world and keeping Zappa's music alive."..."The evening contained a lot of the contradictory eclectic, serious and circusy flavors of a Zappa show...the GrandMothers were able to go deeper into the material, rather than merely parroting Zappa's notoriously tricky composed lines." The GrandMothers of Invention are the only Frank Zappa/Mothers of Invention alumni who have been consistently performing the music of the maestro since 2003. From the classic Freak Out, Absolutely Free, "We're Only In It For The Money", "Uncle Meat", and "Burnt Weeny Sandwich" - to - Weasels Ripped My Flesh, Apostrophe, "The Grand Wazoo", "Overnite Sensation", "Roxy & Elsewhere", "Bongo Fury", and "One Size Fits All" - they have performed on a very long list of classic Frank Zappa & the Mother's of Invention's albums, movies and other projects. (See their combined Frank Zappa/Mothers of Invention discography and videography lists.)
It just happened to be Valentine's Day when my brother helped me to search through my husband's lap top to see whether he had backed up treasured family holidays. I recently had had to call in the experts to have a virus removed from my P.C. There was a real danger all contents to be removed & re-installed. This meant I could have lost everything - all the sentimental memories of us as a family. Luckily that didn't happen. But there were no family photos backed up - well not recent ones. But that was when we discovered what I now know.
Here are the five anniversary brews tracked down for this tasting:
We are not stuck here forever! Now that is comforting, isn’t it! I’d say a hearty “YES!” You and I are living the first day of the rest of eternity together with God. How soothing and wonderful!
voices beyond call to you,
* Don't walk away from the frosting when boiling the butter, cocoa, and milk. You don't want to burn it!
On it is me and my friend Alice! I am a model for most of the products and we both participate in the tutorials
With any luck, I'll finish this draft by the end of August, and then can get back to revisions of my new play, Flight, while this project settles for a month or two. (I figure it'll take me as much as a year to revise the novel to a point where it might be ready to be submitted.)
The phrase being used throughout the mainstream media is "clashes between protesters and police". And while this may make for splashy headlines, it was far from the truth. What kind of clash can there be between overwhelmingly peaceful and idealistic protesters vs. police in riot gear, armed with shields, tear gas, concussion grenades, rubber bullets, and helicopters circling directly overhead? I would describe the mood as a nervous faceoff between officers who know they are in the 99%, and kids with t-shirts and bandanas over their mouths getting a sobering taste of the future (see photo.) That taste, by the way, is tear gas, and it sticks in your throat for a long time.
As medical director of the famed Preventive Medicine Research Institute, Lee Lipsenthal helped thousands of patients struggling with disease to overcome their fears of pain and death and to embrace a more joyful way of living. This is his story.
Crinkled ribbon
10. Peace of Mind – music by Carmi Simon, lyrics and vocals by Edward Stoney Robinson
It has long accused the West, especially Britain, of responsibility for an economic crisis that has impoverished the country, where inflation runs at a world-record high of well over 200 million percent.
Yesterday as I was loading the dryers, she came up to me and suggested I redistribute them. Towels with the sweatpants and all of the sheets alone in another. She described, with obvious rapture, the look of a properly loaded dryer. The gentle tumble, likes with likes, lots of movement and a perfect, slow spiral. She said it was a thing of beauty, a dryer loaded with care and I swear I could see a difference. A mesmerizing, hypnotizing difference.
The last and cutest way to promote an album so here I am sharing with people everyone check out reborn part 1 by brain joo. I promise you will thank me.
Recently I went to a Media Workshop run by
Yukio Mishima’s Confessions of a Mask is the story of a young man who must live behind a mask of social acceptability to hide his homosexuality.
2. Paper plates. Not that I'm not capable of doing the dishes by hand every single meal. It just would have been nice not to have to, that's all.
People will get the chance to meet officers from West Mercia Police and see the latest finger print technology, meet police dogs and their handlers and see how Police Support Units work when sent to major incidents such as last years riots in other parts of the country.
More ominous, however, about the relationship between cattle and human beings lies in their being the most perplexing of species as there is no known evolutionary trail linking them to any other species, it’s as if they just “suddenly” appeared on Earth about 5,000 years ago.
ingredients for one serving:
Located a short 10 minute drive from Palmerston North this 120 acre (48ha more or less) farm provides prudent buyers with an attractive mix of uses and investment options including a proposed five block subdivision plan. The building site options are magnificent with spectacular north facing views to the city. More information
Neighbours. They’re rather tricky.
8 impression
We talked and ate fruit and biscotti and drank wine and sparkling water and Chaka presented herself to be petted. There was a fair amount of hugging. Children and grandchildren came up. Soon everyone was there and we began. Not surprisingly for August in Oakland, it was actually too cool to have the reading in the garden so we were all assembled in the ample living room, surrounded by the lovely items collected by Tom and Leslie over the years of their travels and making a life together. I began by saying that I’d wanted to have this event because I’d missed the first memorial reading and because it just seemed like a good time to do it, even though it was soon, and also because I wanted be together with old friends. I said I found I was often with younger writers and liked them and being with them a lot but wanted to be with people of my own generation in a group like this. The two exceptions to this generational notion were Michael Cross and Brent Cunningham. We’d actually invited a number of other younger people but they hadn’t been able to come. There were a number of people Tom and I might have invited, or it was mostly me doing the inviting, but I was determined to keep it small and so simply stopped after a dozen or so had said yes, hoping not to worry anyone who might later feel they should have been invited.
Nadya Suleman filed for bankruptcy Monday, saying in a court filing that she has as much as $ 1 illion in debt.
Best known for inventing Freddy Krueger, horror titan Wes Craven took a stab at old school zombie folklore in his “based on true events” / “based on a dude’s book” film venture “The Serpent and the Rainbow.” This one stars Bill Pullman, who you might know as the president from Independence Day or that guy I always confuse with Jeff Daniels. Starkwell and Lovelock are intrigued by the possibility that any of what they are about to watch actually happened, and eagerly wait for me to press play.
Be the change you want to see in the world.You should have been mine.I am sorry.
So that’s it:
Eurythmics When tomorrow comes UK
luscious, tantalising and succulent, they're almost edible.
At 1015am (!!!) Your parcel had tried to be delivered but no answer…
For with the heart man believeth unto righteousness; and with the mouth confession is made unto salvation. For the scripture saith, Whosoever believeth on him shall not be ashamed.
They should make a sequel set around their 20th high school reunion (the movie was made 22 years ago) Would be part Big Chill, part Indian Summer. Keating teaches poetry to in-mates and Todd Anderson wrote a coming-of-age story based on Keating. Charlie is dead and Knox and Chris are divorced with three kids. Ends with Keating dying and asking the boys for forgiveness. Neil’s dad overhears the conversations and breaks down screaming “It was all my fault!”
For more on Revolution Wheels please visit www.revolutionwheels.com or contact Warren McKiernan on +44 1827 64111
Of course, Fleming did not kill off 007 and he followed up this novel with the terrific On Her Majesty's Secret Service.
Unlike the famed cherry blossoms in Washington DC, or even in Japan, on the northwest British Columbia coast, sometimes delicate cherry trees are thriving beside soaring old growth trees that have stood for several hundred years. Boughs of tissue-thin, cherry blossom branches dance ballet-like in the wind, against rough, mossy wide girth of Douglas firs.
When I was born my parents were older, and their parents had all passed away. My first five or six years of life were void of grandparents. My mother had a very close friend, who came to visit one Sunday, bringing another couple along. When the other couple came in the back door, I immediately bonded with them. She was a short round little lady, with white hair. Her name was Elsie. Elsie's husband, also short, bald, wore dark rimmed glasses and smoked a cigar. His name was Adam. When I saw this couple, I jumped for joy, and claimed them to be my grandparents, who had finally come to see me. They went along with my dream, even though they had many, many grandchildren of their own. Grandma and Grandpa came to my First Communion, Confirmation and High School Graduation; and all the important times in my life. They loved me like one of their own.
Melissa Awero a member of the committee took out money from her own pocket, to pay for the first obituary notice published in the Daily Nation newspaper.
This set contains 31 paintable patterns.
Lisamarie Lamb
So books - the last chapter? The unicorn says no! This is the first chapter in an exciting publishing sequel, where readers will have more choice and better access to affordable content than ever before, where collectors and physical book lovers will have more beautiful editions to choose from than before, and where authors should be dancing with joy because now they have another way to reach readers that does not depend upon the “promotion for the select few” model that relied heavily upon control of the printing presses, warehousing, bookstore promotions, and sale-or-return (what is THAT all about in the modern age, anyway?!) It’ll mean thinking about new ways to promote those books that are not in the physical bookstores and libraries, and it’ll mean new types of contracts between authors and their publishers and agents. But it’s certainly not a reason for anyone in the business to be gloomy.
“Boy! These Pretzels are making me thirsty!”
pepper powder -1 tsp
Before that end much had she ravelled out
I was starting to worry that our little one’s personality was not the happy little chap we originally thought. I was also pretty fed up with the amount of days we were paying for at nursery and not using; Jay was being sent home weekly because he was too hot/sick/not right.
“Harold, the cats do that.”
I had a hairstyle in mind... so I painted in a block of color to make it stand out more... and then when I was finished I realized... it looked like hair... so I left it like that...
The Workshop in early February was Valentine themed and involved us knitting a heart with lace edging which Susan had sourced from a vintage knitting magazine. It’s a great little project with lots of different stitches and techniques, so an ideal pattern to stimulate learning and discussion of different approaches to techniques.
And I realized I was listening to myself. Ouch.
However, I see hope for the future. Many of my students last year in student teaching told me that I’d be a great teacher someday, and I think they’re right – as long as I see that goal ahead and work hard at it, honing my skills and finding what works for my students, adapting where necessary. I need to be bolder, more creative, and smarter about how I approach the classroom.
“La La La”
But first, the research. I grew up in the country, but not on a farm. I had no idea how goats sounded, how they moved, how they behaved. Lots and lots of Google searches and YouTube videos later, and lots of conversations with people about goat sounds — and naturally, lots of hysterical varieties of baaaa-ing to each other — I had gotten the idea. (SamTheDrummer even suggested this video. Hilarious!) I wrote a three-section jig in e minor filled with repeated notes, jumping intervals and kicky 8th note runs. I loved it.
18. Getting their staff shills to post on writer forums about their author services as if they were bona-fide satisfied customers and posting links back to their employers website.
In an inspired new venture, two independent publishers have got together to produce the best of adult books that they think teenagers would enjoy. A sort of reverse crossover, if you like.
Rayloth simply gave the man a respectful smile and an understanding nod. “No thanks needed, Grunthar,” he said, giving the older man’s shoulder a return squeeze. “We’re just glad she’s safe.”
And then we concluded with la Folie de Begude, a Blanc de Blancs from Chardonnay alone. Not an appellation, as a monocépage is not allowed for sparkling Limoux, so a Vin Mousseux de Qualité. James makes the vin clair and then sends it away to be turned into sparkling wine. It was rounded with soft easy fruit. An interesting figure: it costs 4€ a bottle to turn a still wine into sparkling wine.
Barnard Observatory was scheduled for demolition at one point, but then in 1992 was renovated to its former Neo-classical splendor. It is now home to the Center for the Study of Southern Culture
My azure sea is greying!
May 03 1:47 AM
I'm almost finished on a cardigan and knitting a fluffy heart and I'm called on to help other learner knitters so lovin it.
Launay's paintings interweave lush settings with a vision of mama Earth, with long flowing hair. Launay's Mama Earth will appeal to many young children, drawing on a sense of fairy tales and imagination.
As I explore who I am as a Canadian-American, I’ll clearly have to embrace the culture … my culture. I’m headed to the store now to seek out some Molson and wonder if I can find some snow shoes here in Indiana.
Well soon "tomorrow" will be C.A.P's third birthday.
That fucking garden..... I gave up on this planting. The only thing that sprouted in any edible quantity was the radishes and the starters that I bought are doing great. Matter of fact I had to take a tomato plant out of my patch 'cause them motherfuckers flat out exploded and there wasn't any air circulation in the middle of the patch. I didn't want to nurture those tomatoes only to have them mold up on me.
Getting Things Done
What fictional character would you most like to have been?
Fly agaric is found across the northern hemisphere and has long been used by mankind for its psychotropic properties. But its use can be dangerous because it also contains toxic substances. Reindeer seem to metabolise these toxic elements without harm, while the main psychoactive constituents remain unmetabolised and are excreted in the urine. Reindeer herders in Europe and Asia long ago learnt to collect the reindeer urine for use as a comparatively safe source of the hallucinogen.
The rains, the dark clouds and the wind – if put together – can be a deadly combination for those who want to relax and have a good time. Their combined effect has never felt so enchanting as this before. Long live Bangalore weather for having cheered us up with these heavenly drops of rains.
in the long run
Maybe I should have called this post “H8ing the D8ing Game.”
Last night I returned home to find the following comment here on my blog, I am responding because I am hoping that it was written with an undertone of concern and not bitterness and biting venom...it is tough to tell via a comment so we will go with the first and some of these are legit concerns:
We stood there for a moment, both of us trying to ignore the proverbial "elephant in the livingroom", which for us was the "opossum in flower bed," and when neither of us volunteered to speak up, I seized the day and said what needed to be said: "When are you going to scoop it out?"
Chakwana, who claimed that the sex was consensual, will be sentenced next month.
The footage here is amazing, some of the best that DisneyNature has come up with in their four releases to date. Sadly, there was no preview for their next film (as they have traditionally done with all their releases until now) so there’s a very real possibility this may be the last DisneyNature release for awhile – let’s hope not. I’d love to see some looks at animal life in the Australian outback, in China, or the rain forests of South America. These days most nature documentaries seem to be stuck in Africa and the Arctic, which is fine because there is plenty to see but the world is a diverse place and I’d love to see some nature documentaries set in other places as well.
I like to plant tree seeds and have a few on the go, sadly my baby oak didn't make it through the winter so I'm on the hunt for acorns this year, not many oak trees to be found here.
The occupants of that ship were told that they would not die but that they would be castaways. We, who trust the blood of Jesus Christ for our salvation, are promised and given eternal life but meanwhile we are castaways on earth. Why do we have to spend an undetermined length of time here when we might as well be enjoying the bliss of heaven?
Back at Motown, Ware began collaborating with Arthur "T-Boy" Ross, younger brother of Motown star Diana Ross, and they came up with "I Wanna Be Where You Are," which Michael Jackson recorded for Motown on his early-1972 album Got to Be There. Released as a single in the spring, it peaked at number two on the R&B charts and reached the Top 20 of the pop charts. Over time, it became one of Ware's most-covered songs, earning recordings by José Feliciano, Marvin Gaye, SWV, and others. In 1973, Ware had songwriting credits on albums by the Average White Band, Donny Hathaway, and the Jackson 5. "Give Me Just Another Day," which he wrote for the Miracles, was released as a single on Tamla that fall and reached the R&B charts. His next R&B singles chart entry came with "If You Were My Woman," an answer record to the Gladys Knight & the Pips hit "If You Were My Man," recorded by Latimore on Glades Records, in the spring of 1974. That same season saw the release of a more important project for him, Quincy Jones' LP Body Heat on A&M Records. Ware was both a writer and performer on the disc, which topped the R&B charts and reached the pop Top Ten, going gold. "If I Ever Lose This Heaven," which he wrote with Pam Sawyer and sang on the album with Minnie Riperton and Al Jarreau, was an R&B singles chart entry in September. Nearly a year later, it gained even greater renown when it was covered by the Average White Band on Atlantic for a single that reached the Top 40 of both the pop and R&B charts. It went on to become another major copyright for Ware, covered by such artists as Jonathan Butler, Sergio Mendes, and Nancy Wilson. Meanwhile, the title track from Body Heat, co-written by Ware, also became an R&B singles chart entry in the spring of 1975. "Rolling Down a Mountainside," which he wrote with Jacqueline Hilliard, also became an R&B hit, this one for the Main Ingredient on RCA Victor Records that spring, peaking in the Top Ten and also getting into the pop chart before serving as the title track on the group's next album. Ware collaborated with Minnie Riperton and Richard Rudolph on "Inside My Love," which was featured on her Epic Records album Adventures in Paradise, also released in the spring of 1975. Issued as a single that summer, the song became a Top 40 R&B hit and reached the pop charts.
I actually have three blogs right now, with different themes, all for the sake of having a place to be required to practice. Personal journals are great, but there is nothing like public shame for a good motivator. A private journal could sit and rot for a year, and nobody would ever know. But out here, somebody might stumble across my blog and see nothing but short, infrequently updated, poorly conceived entries. There’s an immediacy in the striving, to try to vindicate my absurd claims to being a writer, and make it less absurd.
I've worn L'Instant, L'instant magique, Angélique noire and My Insolence, but I find this one to be the most "classic" of recent launches (I guess along with other Shalimar flankers).
02. The Sun and The Melody - Part2
So anyways, here's a couple of my finds.
It’s seeing my children embrace the world,
Now, speaking in tongues may manifest not only in personal prayer but it may also be the media whereby the Lord wishes to express a word of prophecy to the community. In such cases it is necessary that there be someone in the community to interpret so that it can be of benefit to all. One is also free to ask the Holy Spirit to interpret their prayer language when praying in private.
Lilacs are another favorite. My old ones have been here for years and years, and are beginning to suffer some from age, but they still bloom fairly well, and they are an early lure for butterflies, especially the monarchs. A couple of years ago we bought some rebloomers, but this is the first year they’ve bloomed at all, so I don’t know yet how well they will do. I also purchased a yellow lilac, but it didn’t survive.
we split, so many skins dividing
ATMOSPHERE and CLIMATE – “With rising temperatures, rising sea levels, melting icecaps and glaciers, shifting ocean currents and weather patterns, climate change is the most serious challenge facing the human race. The livestock sector is a major player, responsible for 18 percent of greenhouse gas emissions measured in CO2 equivalent.”
Oliver Randl has found an interesting decision on K's law. It actually relates to the question whether or not the EPO's BoA are entitled to revoke a patent.
There’s an overall surfer/ocean vibe going on caused by the immediate proximity of Bondi Beach and Tamarama, two of the most known beaches in the whole Australia….and so, the atmosphere is pretty chilled.
Have you been wishing for a more comfort-filled way to play touch football with your pals? Or maybe the tennis court is just a little too cold for you to head out and have a match with your favorite partner mid-January. Perhaps you're in the mood for a jog, but the air outside has gotten a bit too nippy for you to enjoy the endorphin rush properly?
Just one picture this week…I’ve been horrible about taking pictures! Not because I’m not getting dressed, but because I keep forgetting to take the picture!
This adorable stocking card is CASEd from the super talented Vicki Burdick. I saw a very similar card on her blog and decided I had to make it for myself. I changed very little from her version and I would love to link to her original but that feature seems to be down on blogger as I type this post. If you would like to see her original, please give me just a little time and I will try to get that fixed.
Oh and the UK covers are so gorgeous as this blog post shows - the cover on my review of Inside Out is of the Australian cover and it really doesn't do it justice at all! *laughs*
All of this evidence DPD either had or could have received before first indictment issued.
Dauntless: Bravery, pierced, tattooed, black-clothed, jump from trains, protection, chaotic, as of right now, skewed views; Manifesto: “We believe in ordinary acts of bravery, in the courage that drives one person to stand up for another.” Flaw: PRIDE
David said he’s been hearing about the Day of Rage in his city, and is being asked about it by concerned citizens.
“I didn’t know for sure until you admitted it just now, but I thought it had to be something like that. Couldn’t figure out why you’d offer up the card without being asked, but when I looked at your crime scene photos and saw what a good photographer you are, I figured you didn’t want to take a chance on losing your best work.”
(You’ll never need that cabin,)
When everything is covered in snow it's sometimes difficult to remember that snow is made of water. In Nordreisa snow and water are each as much a part of life as the other, but in my mind, until now, they have been two separate things. Water is what lies between us and the mountains opposite. It's what comes down from the spring behind the house for us to drink and wash in. It's what turns to light-blue ice under the bridge or on the road into town where your car goes into the ditch. Snow is what falls from the sky and paints the landscape white. It's what you hike through or ski on. It's the thing that sometimes hides the whole world behind a wall of falling fragments and settles on the roofs of houses and the branches of trees.
Panda Chick Who's All Diplomatic: "We're here to offer humble service to your Emperor." /polite bow
I’ll be repaired
I think it was Jan Needle who described The Salt-Stained Book as “a weird one” or maybe it was a reviewer on Amazon. Or both. They’re right of course and finally I think I’ve understood with that well-meaning publisher was trying to say. Perhaps some books cope better than others with the sell-or-pulp culture of instant exposure that corporate marketing offers, before it moves relentlessly onwards to the next new product in its hungry search for hits. If an independently published and individually marketed book finds its niche then perhaps there will be the time for it to grow slowly. I'm still not comfortable with the word cult but a niche that gradually gets populated could reasonably hope to grow into ... a teeny, tiny ... hit?
Mr Fish Shop insisted I have a gift in thanks, which was a bit of swordfish he prepared with lemon juice and herby marinade ('Salt it for half an hour, cover it and cook it in the oven for 20 minutes and have it with some mash, that's all you need'), and some dressed crab from Cornwall. He also gave me £20 for the church - 'I had prayers said in my old shop elsewhere and promised to give something to the church but never did, so this is paying ma debts'.
Take this part slow. Since you are going through so many layers, it is pretty thick, especially when you get close to the spikes. Make sure to back stitch at each end.
Roasted Herbed Stuffed Trout,
You won't find bridges like this in the middle of Smalltown, Iowa. But you also won't find miles of corn fields planted on Lake Erie. Whatever the setting, no matter how boring it might seem, there is something unique about it that can be used to bring relevant conflict and adventure to your story.
Little sis Omicron in dashing form
Why do I still have no patience with the twins fighting with each other? Why do I yell so much? Why raise my voice when I don"t have to?
On our way in to the park we were warned by several volunteers that the campground at the end of the road (Flamingo) was overwhelmed with mosquitos. But after our summer horse packing trip with Maddie we felt prepared. Plus, we had four cans of repellent and the screens on the trailer are good.
100g butter
I can’t thank you enough for all of the kinds words, thoughts, prayers, and encouraging words! I’m so lucky to have such amazing family, friends, and of course Blog Friends! My sisters have both been down to stay with me while Kevin was at work today. My Mom came down today, too! She made me my favorite dinner and we just relaxed and spent time together all day. It was really nice! :) Kevin’s parents have been down to visit and they brought me beautiful flowers! I was so happy that my Dad and Step-Mom came down the day of the surgery. It was a lot easier to deal with surrounded by loved ones!
Tony comes home, ready to shut down the industries, but he is blindsided by his own firm, and told that he suffers from post traumatic stress disorder and should lay low until he feels better. He then goes about designing the Iron Man suit once more, perfecting it.
Wow, it's been a long week. We are just finishing up our IOWA State Testing - The longest test ever! I am very proud of my students for getting through it because I almost felt like I wouldn't survive reading all the directions and everything. For the most part they are doing well, but for the short timed parts (for example, math computation) they are having difficulty. Anyone have any tips to speed their time besides taking timed test after timed test? We did try this, but since it was a "state test", I think they wanted to do so well that they took their time (a little too much).
The rest are from a date Drew and I went on. We went to a park and I brought my telephoto lens, he brought his gun. We both did a lot of "shooting." (Like that pun? haha)
As James Swan has noted, however, Roman Catholic Bibles are Bigger than Athanasius’ Bible. They include “The Wisdom of Solomon, and the Wisdom of Sirach, and Esther, and Judith, and Tobit,” which Athanasius indicated that he did not accept as part of the canon of inspired Scripture.
COST: $125/person
Scientist Andre Delambre (David Hedison), and the paste that used to be his head and arm, are found inside a hydraulic press, with his wife Helene (Patricia Owens) standing at the controls. She confesses to the murder, but refuses to provide any reason for it. The loss of her husband has been replaced with a new fascination with flies. They instantly capture her attention, but she’s always disappointed when she inevitably finds out that their head and arms are not white. So, obviously, we all assume she’s nuts. Eventually, her son Phillipe (Charles Herbert) lets slip to Andre’s brother Francois (Vincent Price) that Helene told him to capture the white headed fly and bring it to her, but never why. Confronted with this information, Helene confesses what actually happened to Andre to Francois and Inspector Charas (Herbert Marshall). Andre had been working on a matter teleporter, but had only been able to transport inanimate objects, though they would be a little off, like when he teleported a plate and the “Made in Japan” logo appeared like a mirror image when it came through. As he tries to fix it, he accidentally disintegrates the family’s cat, which can somehow still meow when turned into atoms. Eventually, he safely transports a gerbil into Richard Gere’s butt. And then, without explanation, Joe locks himself in his lab and won’t receive visitors. Eventually, he tells Helene through notes passed under the door that he had an accident and can’t speak, but he desperately needs her to locate and capture a fly with a white head and arms. Turns out, Andre tried to teleport himself but there was a fly in the machine. He came through on the other side, his head and arm switched with the fly’s own. And, unless Helene can catch the fly so he can fix it, he needs her to kill him. I wonder how this will turn out …
It seems that BD were prepared to concede that they could not have their beer in 30 litre 'key kegs' (lined kegs which mean the beer does not come into contact with any 'extraneous gas'), instead 'reluctantly agreeing' to supply beer in 18 gallon casks.
I shall give a mouth to my son.
Saw Woody Allen's Midnight in Paris at a late-night showing in a tiny theater on the Upper West Side, waited in line with New Yorkers clutching plastic bags of movie snacks. This felt very Woody Allen to me and I totally appreciated it. Also found myself complaining to John and my sister that I didn't want to go to the film if it meant I was going to miss the previews - this was of course so Annie Hall that I had to google it but that scene occurred somewhere in the 90s. It turned out that showing was sold out anyway and so we had to catch the one a half hour later, where we still had to stand in line for seats. This was not my first film nerd moment that day - the first was when we were handed a flier nearby for that film where Michelle Williams plays Marilyn Monroe, and my sister was telling me they were shooting the film in London when they were shooting the one she co-produced, and it was about Marilyn having an affair with the third DA of a film she shot in London , and I said, well, that has to be The Prince and the Showgirl, and then proceeded to spout off trivia like Vivien Leigh's hysterical pregnancy produced to deter Olivier from Marilyn Monroe, or perhaps as a result of jealousy that the role she originated on stage was replaced by this blonde breathy upstart, of course though this is all gossip and demonology - it's probably totally false. On the flight to NYC I found myself gobbling up Laurie Week's Zipper Mouth - which I have been rapturously anticipating since reading an excerpt in Vice years ago, that snippet a series of high-school letters to Sylvia Plath, but the character in the novel is also obsessed with Vivien Leigh and that felt like kinship. The book is totally Burroughs-femme, bonkers, amazeballs - it comes out the same day as Green Girl - everyone who reads this blog should read it. Absolutely. Everyone. There is not one of you who won't buy it and fall madly in love with it and be like - fuck, yeah, yes, all of that. I might be reviewing it and then I will properly contextualize it - but it's like gonzo-Beats-queer-feminine-druggy-ecstasy. It is one of the best novels about a fucked-up girl written from her perspective I have ever read, if not the best. Period. It is the kind of book I keep on saying should be written and read.
428
It’s what’s known on the left as the false equivalency; the idea that Fox news may be partisan, but they’re really just the flip side of MSNBC. The idea that Sean Hannity may not be objective, but his reporting is no more slanted than Rachael Maddows. The idea that Rush Limbaugh may be abrasive, but he’s just the rights version of, I don’t know, Stephanie Miller. In this case, by simply using both Hillary Rosen and Ted Nugent in the same article, even though he doesn’t try to equate the gravity of their comments, Mr. OBrien is, I believe unintentionally, asserting that Ted Nugent is the same as Hillary Rosen, just on opposing sides. And in a world where someone shouted ‘kill him’ about Barack Obama at a John McCain rally, who in the punditry world is doing the provoking and how much, is a relevant question to consider.
One of my favorite beers was beers was released earlier this week. If you see any be sure to buy some and stash it away. This beer is lovely with a year or so of aging. They also make great Christmas presents.
I'm very much looking forward to your recipes. Thanks again for allowing me to dine at your tables.
Recently we traveled to Alsace for the Christmas holiday for an overdue reunion with friends. We are “les invités” although frankly, we invited ourselves to join these friends and their family hoping to add to their pleasure but knowing that we also add to the work and expense of the holidays. In French, hôte is a role that applies to both host and guest, so not surprisingly, we fight over who has the right to pay the bill at the restaurant when we go out to eat. We are told not to bring anything with us when we eat at our friends’ home, but we do anyway. Our conversations are sometimes in English and sometimes in French because we all want to practice our language skills. My husband makes great strides in the new language because he never hesitates to try it. He tends to use whatever French words he knows to replace their English counterparts in his conversations. Sometimes he composes complete sentences in French.
He told me I could open my eyes, and there it was. Our second copy of Flea Market Style Mag!
So many times I have wondered what might become of me if I were to find out that my very own Famous “Dead” Person was actually an impostor (or that I had been misunderstanding everything), as my ex-friend insisted. It seems especially unlikely in this case, since I became interested in Chopin after having my first anomalous experience involving him in my teens, rather than starting out as a fan and then concocting some sort of connection with him. I have tried to think about this as unemotionally as possible. It would be one of the worst things I could imagine, but then, it wouldn’t really change the history of our relationship over the years. The fascinating ideas he’s transmitted, the emotional and physical healings for myself and others, and the sense of deep love and support would be the same. And one way or the other, I’ve gotten some great piano lessons.
11) Ready to serve. (with chilli sauce)
First a dusting, then heavier and heavier until the afternoon where it became clear it was not stopping anytime soon and this was, in fact, a full on snowstorm (I found out later this was the first one of this magnitude in Paris in 25 years). When they shut down the buses and the trains at rush hour, I knew we were in trouble as our clinic was across town. Paris is not like NY where you can get a car service or taxi any day, any time, any weather. Paris is Paris. She shuts down at the first sign of trouble and leaves you to hang on your own. As I had been previously warned about NOT calling an ambulance service or the fire department should I be in labor due to 45 minute paperwork processes, untrained drivers, unnecessary episiotomies and the biggest fact that they would only bring you to nearest hospital, not the one I was registered at across town....we thought if we waited until after rush hour we might have a better chance at getting a taxi. At 10:00PM I could take no more. My midwife awaited our arrival at the center and FB began the taxi cab calls.
Oh how I was excited about this and as I'm not really creative in the sense of putting together any stuff with all these templates they offer you on the site (maybe this is just because I'm not bothered to try it once in a while), I always go for the easiest: White background and items neatly put in an order.
But before this turns into an episode of What's Davin Eating, I should move away from the subject of cupcakes and announce quite clearly that what I'm really thinking about is how I have more ideas for novels than I will ever have time to write.
Some people call it "leading a straight-edge lifestyle," I just think I have no desire to try it.
Jose Mendez - Almendares Blues
Eli was a great male lead and he was a refreshing change from the usual perfect boys we find so often in YA fiction. I loved how his and Auden’s relationship flourished and they complimented each other so well. I think their relationship is one of the more realistic I’ve come across in a contemporary novel in a long while, which was great.
And what else? Well I used to be quite jealous of this sister, because she could somehow eye a man up at twenty paces and the next thing he’d be sitting next to her – ignoring lissom, intellectual MOI – and buying her drinks and chatting her up like crazy! This woman is petite, cute and an Olympic level flirt! Anyway my beautiful sister, while not being exactly a saint – who is, anyway! – is really lovable and intelligent and unique and the best friend anyone could ever have – so I wrote her a silly story to celebrate.
there are sketchings and paintings
Without a reason?
At the one-hour mark, they finally let economics and the Fed drop and moved on to the nail-biting, edge-of-your-seat topic of…
Last year while I was composing an article about Record Store Day I came across my first unique Grimes memorabilia and introduction to this amazing artist. For those unaware, like the recent resurgence of vinyl, cassettes have become the latest and coolest boutique items music collectors can purchase. Lately, many underground artists have self-released their EPs on cassette tapes to give locals a fun throwback feel with their music listening experience. Believe me the whole nostalgia thing really resonates with yours truly. As a result I became exposed to many new artists because of this cassette phenomenon, especially when I visited Vacation Vinyl in Silver Lake for the first time. During that first visit I discovered Grimes debut Geidi Primes on cassette and was immediately intrigued by the cover.
I stopped at roadside fruit and nut establishments and bought the requisite bags of grapefruit and oranges, admired the air plants tucked into shells, postcards with gators biting the asses of beach babes, salt water taffy and those pitiful hermit crabs that are doomed to die in some yankee tourist's terrarium.
So, I want live vicariously through each and everyone of you! Tell me where you are, you don't have to be specific, but maybe the state or region. Write a blog post about the pro's and con's of where you are living life, and leave some pictures. Link back here, so I can read your posts, and maybe other bloggers can too. Thanks!
I have in my heart, the long hours you took to help me learn my prayers, and do my homework.
1. the quality, production, expression, or realm, according to aesthetic principles, of what is beautiful, appealing, or of more than ordinary significance.
JH is blunt enough to still offer her a contract with J Fashion for their NY debut.
The SNP has welcomed the comments as further evidence that an independent Scotland would remain a member of the EU.
AS for myself, I am constantly striving.
As so often in his books, McCarthy places his characters in anarchic circumstances to show the true nature of man when law and governance cease to control them. In The Road, that world was post-apocalyptic. In Blood Meridian it is the harsh and lawless landscape of the US Mexican border region from 1847 to 1861. We follow the life of a character known only as “the kid” who runs away at 14. We don’t know much about his motivation but we do know, that ” in him broods already a taste for mindless violence”
These are inalienable rights of all Human Beings on this planet. How about EQUALITY Mr. Prime Minister?
The staff of Instagram is extremely pleased with the offer to join Facebook and surely they will want to keep their same users of Instagram despite this change. People are frantically trying to delete their Instagram account and are expressing their fears of changes that Facebook will make to it. It seems, however, that these fears are just that and actually, no changes will be made. If anything, Instagram will only become better, not ruined.
How are you celebrated?
Early in the week, I was approached by one of my students about the internship he's applying for at NASA. Since it's in the States and all, he needed to make sure his English sounded "American" and that his resume was in the correct form. I spent the week meeting with him, re-working his resume, proofreading essays, and explaining instructions. I'm just lucky that this student is basically fluent since he lived in Michigan for 6 years. I can almost talk like a normal person to him! But I now know more about NASA type projects than any normal non-engineering person should know. I know he has very little chance, but my fingers are tightly crossed for him!
despise? no one, that would be giving someone too much power over me.
Plot: Once upon a time Brenna Yovanoff, Maggie Stiefvater and Tessa Gratton challenged themselves to write a short story every week. Some of the stories were based on a theme, others were the seeds of novels to come, all were experiments meant to test their limits as writers. This is a selection of those short stories from their Merry Sisters of Fate website.
i did not expect to blog while vacationing. i did not know how much access i would have to a computer. and i really didn't think i could do anything with my photos, because my father-in-law's laptop does not have photoshop. but i decided to give pic monkey a try while my baby boy is napping {in the pack-n-play, not the pool *wink*}. that would be the reason for the hodge-podge look of my photos... i had to try all the different processing tricks up their sleeves over at pic monkey. it's a pretty cool site! if you don't have photoshop, you should try it... especially now that picnik is a thing of the past.
4 mounted
Pre-heat oven to 400 degrees F.
period-piece and argues for meaningful links between the early poem, the later ones and the prose-works. She posits that the major turning-point of Mirrlees’ life was the death of Jane Harrison in 1928 and her subsequent conversion to Catholicism, entailing a long-term repudiation of the life she had previously lead, including perhaps the intellectual daring and iconoclasm that had
But once you’re used to them, the offers are a breeze.
i stopped teaching
Smaller differences
Let me weep alone but I know misery loves company,
The girls will want some flowers new;
My first exam is tomorrow morning, then I have another two later on in the week. Really not looking forward to this week, but in seven days most of my exams will be over! I will schedule a few posts for this week but my main concern is revising and more revising. BOO. Not long now! The only thing getting me through this is the release of the Mystery Jets new album Radlands. I haven't stopped listening to their single, it's amazing!
“We’ve already worked with other parties on the budget this year and we have to continue to work together as Glasgow needs more than one party to take on the challenges facing the city.”
I could blame my temper on the kids who called me names every single day for years. The ones who threw rocks at me, who spat on me, and who told me that I could never be anyone of worth.
“Some changes look negative on the surface, but you will soon realize that space is being created in your life for something new to emerge.”
Reading: nothing at all.
the only reason I helped her was because she was either going to be safe with me or she was gonna go downtown where she'd be away from everyone.
Tuesday May 8th- I was in pain. It hurt to walk, hurt to stand, hurt to sit, hurt to lay needless to say I stayed in bed most of the day. I didn't get anything done that I wanted to do that day. I was feeling so much pressure I kept thinking my water was going to break (remember I was 4 cm and 50% effaced). James packed up the car for me that night and we attempted to go to bed ( we had to be up at 4 am to call the hospital and see if they had any beds). I thought I was wasn't going to be able to sleep due to anticipation of being induced the next day, but I couldn't sleep due to what I now know were contractions. I was in pain all that night. I kept telling myself I only had a few more hours and to suck it up. I laid in bed that night and mostly moaned in pain finally at 2:00am I got up and decided it was enough pain and it was time to shower and call the hospital. Around 2:30 I woke up James and told him to get dressed. I was having very sharp pains but my stomach never got hard so I didnt think I was contracting, I wasn't going to take any risks because I was already 4cm dilated. I was not going to have him at home! This is funny now looking back. I took a shower, blow dried my hair , put on my make up and straightened my hair all while contracting every 2 minutes!! I was in so much pain but I wanted to look cute for pictures. Finally around 3:30 I called the hospital. They told me to come on it they were not going to send me home.
2. The lost art of conversation
Before I close, I would like to share with you a list of products that contain Aborted Fetal Products, readers this is not a joke and what we eat does matter to our Creator, our Messiah. Please make yourself aware and take responsibility, be diligent and learn about what is being put in our food. With love, blessings, and shalom. May your Shabbat be full of Him!
2 seconds ago
Pediatrician: "Does she know her colors?"
On the other side, Hank and Bobby-Joe were both ravenous after having eaten bananas and dates for breakfast and came across a highly recommended little place that promised to give the comfort we were looking for after a stretch of 5 hours in the Chevy.
That brings me to another young man with tremendous upside potential – Ryan Bailey. The 22 year old Bailey is a year older than Bolt was entering the Olympic year of ’08 but has bests of 9.88/20.10 in spite of missing the 2011 season to injury. Bailey has two things going for him as he enters the Olympic season however. One is that he brings the tall sprint frame that Bolt has made famous – 6’ 4” tall and extremely coordinated. As a matter of fact looking at football stars such as Calvin “Megatron” Johnson (6’ 5”), Brandon Marshall (6’ 4”), Antonio Gates (6’4”), and Kellen Winslow (6’ 4”) tall is the new athletic! The second thing he has going for him is his new choice in coaches – sprint guru John Smith. As fast as Bailey has been to date, his start has been horrible and he has had difficulty staying healthy. Smith teaches the most efficient start technique in sprinting history, the Drive Phase, and has shown throughout his history to be able to keep his athletes healthy and fit – his latest being Daegu sprint and hurdle champions Carmelita Jeter and Jason Richardson. And did I mention he coached multiple World and Olympic champion Maurice Greene? Bailey should benefit greatly from Smith’s tutelage.
MITCHELL R, HUYNH V, PAK J, THOMPSON S, NOSEWORTHY AL. Influenza outbreak in an Ontario long-term care home – January 2005. Can Commun Dis Rep 2006; 32: 257-262.
If you cannot get away for the entire weekend, please still come visit with me at Simply Oklahoma in Guthrie on the Second Saturday Art Walk and plan on taking home some lovely, lovely things.
As the audience already knows, Tuck and FDR are best buddies at the CIA and have recently been grounded for acting like murderous assholes on a supposedly ‘discreet’ mission. Their boss, some cranky CIA chief (Angela Bassett), is a woman who acts like a man having trouble with one of his prostates. It’s terribly confused acting, presumably the result of a woman in a upper-level job doing her best to overcome the crippling weakness of having a vagina, while also being cleared for access to top-secret information and high-powered guns.
1. I start with a doodle or an idea in pencil. (Mine are usually done at work on a scrap of paper)
And, as I mentioned in my post "A JUNKMARKET Style event in O-H-I-O!!!!!" - Katie Palmer, of Sobo Style is having a Pre-Country Living Fair Party on Thursday, September 23rd from 6:00pm to 8:00pm - and we're SOOOO excited. Sue will be signing books, sharing JUNK, and there will be wine and cheese, some giveaways, and plenty of shopping to do as well! That sounds like enough to keep us busy for the evening! AND - I've even "finally" picked out what I'm going to wear - ha ha - you know that's always a BIG decision, right???
Clothes trade = automatic BFF
Originally written for Hinterland Projects Publication 2 (2009)
a) I had a couple of days when I felt a little under par
and loose leaf tea needs room to expand as it steeps.
Let's just hope I don't get kicked in them!
I popped my head into the room, and he's staring off to his left, with a right-sided facial droop that I didn't recall seeing 20 min earlier when I was last in the room. We asked him to say his name, and his speech was slurred and unintelligible. He was able to lift his left arm on command, and give my hand a good squeeze, but we couldn't get any response from the right hand side. Couldn't even get him to turn his head that direction.
Q. So, coming into spontaneous labour - that happens best at home?
Unsurprisingly, our hotel was packed with librarians, too, and every day more tote bags replaced purses and suitcases. By the time the trade show floor opened, the bags were stuffed with books and posters. It was heartening to see the distinctive red Sisters in Crime bags amongst those from publishers and distributors.
The coroner noted “skin
If, however, you read this post and feel these models are yours, please contact me. For evidence, I’d like you to describe the parts used in the Doom conversion, as well as the venomthrope.
Marvin Kitman. The television critic for Newsday for 35 years beginning in 1969. I have not thought about him for decades, but he was the first "columnist" I read as a teen. He was funny, in an over-the-top blustery kind of way. And one thing that he was known for was his impassioned dislike of Sue Simmons.
Had to include this one! This is what I look like at least once daily when it suddenly hits me (again) that we’re going to have five kids.
A beyond pissed off Canada.
Bottom line:
We got into the waiting room, and they called me back a few times. Once for consent forms & payment, a second time for final eye check ups (like the dryness of my eyes, and thickness of corneas), once to give me Valium to relax & an advil, and then finally to go into the waiting area.
What was their five year goal for development and growth?
We all need those regularly.
So enjoy some of the most incredible cakes I have had the pleasure of working with - all of the other e-vents can no be seen in a beautiful online magazine which I have linked to below. The magazine was designed by Nicole from Pretty and Print and will be available for purchase in hard copy very soon with a small portion of the proceeds going toward breast cancer funding.
It seems helpful to lay out my clothes the day before a big presentation. I have a long “must do” list to prepare. Now I study and practice, no matter how awesome I think I am. Years back, after the embarrassing flop that appeared to put listeners to sleep, I learned a hard lesson about planning and preparation. It is never an option to not prepare. Being over-confident is a lonely road back to reality. Being willing to do what God calls you to do is step one, but beyond that you must still prepare for the challenges that are ahead. Don’t ever assume that just because of your calling and gifts there is no need to prepare. Take it from me, BIG MISTAKE sister.
Lord, help me to be more tender, joy-filled, gracious....
Just read the opening paragraph! A mother consults with Wertham, frantically and anxiously relating that her four year old daughter was being roughed up by small boys in her apartment building, boys aged 3 to 9. Three to nine! They hit the girl, tie her up with rope, push her, etc. Now I ask, what mother places her 4-year old daughter "unsupervised" in the play care of rowdy, strange children? I have a daughter who is now 19. When she was 4 years old she wouldn't be out of our sight. This is plain and simple a case of poor parenting. The answer lies anywhere from not allowing the young girl out unsupervised to speaking to the parents of the unruly children. Today, this woman would be reported to Child Protective Services.
If you read my Smart Cover review, you know that I was a little bit skeptical to purchase the Smart Cover because it didn’t cover the back of my precious iPad. After I finally decided to buy the cover, I found this back cover for the iPad, so I can use Apple’s ingenious cover, as well as have a case to protect the back from scratches. Basically, the Smart Cover Companion is a clear plastic case that has a cut-out on the left side for the Smart Cover to attach to the iPad. It also has cutouts for the camera, microphone, dock connector, headphone jack, sleep/wake button, and the volume controls. It fits the Smart Cover perfectly, while still protecting the back of the iPad, and it even makes the Smart Cover more stable while using it as a typing stand.
High to soar, and deep to dive,
& we can't find each other in the night?
We will begin revealing our National Scrapbook Day schedule starting tomorrow in the forum. We want to get you supply lists and give your mojo time to kick into high gear.
Maternal Joy –Ticket To The North Pole –with the great Heavy Bonehead B side: Fat
From the time Rob had died until March 9th, I did not know how Rob had ended his life. I had thought many times about it, but finally made the decision to stop tormenting myself with questions I couldn’t have answers to. On Friday, March 9th, the same week my in-laws were both hospitalized, I got a call at work from the Coroner’s Office.
I think, in my opinion, that is the reason why this causes so much trouble among fans. The "Main character" or "Primary POV" becomes an almost surrogate. Eddard then, is the reader, thus it is the reader who is beheaded. I know I've heard from other people that other characters are the "Real" main character. Everyone from Daenarys to Jon to Arya to whomever you please. Heck, when I first read the book I assumed Bran would be the main character, I was actually highly unhappy when he was injured, and only once I realized "Oh this is a plot device for his father's story" did I continue to read. Killing off fan favorite characters is something which the other man referenced, Joss Whedon, is well known for.
"No."
"for the information transmitted" as per Article 12 of the Directive is a carefully delineated and limited concept. As regards copyright material, this language broadly contemplates a scenario in which a person other than the ISP has unlawfully placed the material in the public domain or has unlawfully downloaded such material, and a question then arises whether the ISP, putatively a mere conduit for the transmission of the information, also incurs a legal liability in respect of the infringement. That liability could take the form of a fine (in criminal or regulatory proceedings) or damages or other compensation payable to the copyright owner, or some form of injunctive relief. The liability could be joint and several with the other person, or it could simply be a default liability if the other person could not be found, or was not worth pursuing, or was insolvent.
So, do your family a favor and make these treats for yourselves ...
Thanks to my great sister and brother-in-law, we got to enjoy this past 4th of July weekend on their boat with a visit from my parents. Even Hendrix got to tag along!
The Lost Children by Carolyn Cohagan Book Review
I called the Ft Bliss appointment line, and got myself an appointment for Topomax. Next Tuesday. Cause I ran out yesterday. Oops. And asked about Jake. What should I do? Take him to the MD on post? Nope, because they would want him to see a child psychiatrist. And if his regular psychiatrist won't see him (CPT called yesterday), then PEAKS would be the best decision, right? Sigh. I'm still not liking this decision.
We set off for Lubljana, the idea being that we take a quick drive through the city to determine whether we want to come back later and sleep there. Anna had booked us for three nights in Skofja Loka, much against my initial resistance. She liked the place, and thought that we could use it as a base for exploring a big chunk of Slovenia.
3. Check your hamster(s) over for any physical problems, like lacerations, cuts, etc.
3-4 cloves of garlic, minced
Pelham Bay Golf Course, Par 36
Here yet again, Sky News has cannibalised much of Murdoch’s opinion-leader readership. Sky’s business news offer is generally better than the Beeb’s news channel, and more European than either CNN or Bloomberg. But equally important, it’s yet another 24/7 operation. The only way forward for a quality print title in the 21st century is going to be stuff – either scoop analyses or dramatically expressed opinion – that you cannot get anywhere else….either online or off.
Strength to fight back, against feet tethered tight,
Simply Gorjuss 'Holly' stamp.
Seeing as how we just got engaged and all – we don’t quite have ALL of the details worked out. But, we do have several important pieces of information nailed down. I’d say we’re doing quite well with all this decision making. So, here’s what we know:
There are some interesting parallels between the themes covered in my book and those in Bifo Berardi's The Soul at Work: for instance, the power of technology to restrict as well as liberate, and the use of anxiety and debt as control mechanisms. Berardi also explores abstract areas I was wary of straying too far into as a relative novice, particularly drawing on Deleuze/Guattari to contextualise these themes.
Meanwhile, police put up crime scene tape around Beauchamp’s house, where at least four children lived, neighbors said.
Emotionally and socially I feel a lot younger, more like fourteen socially and ten emotional wise. This is slowly progressing as when I was in high school. I read a report where my maturity matched a six year olds. I like toys and reading YA fiction Things like paying bills or other adult duties are beyond me. My room looks like it belongs to a 12 year old boy. I tend to get along with people a lot younger than me. I relate better with them and can put myself in their shoe more so than I can the adult characters.
BBC REPORTER 1: Couldn’t be clearer. Excellent.
a huge store on two floors where they sell branded goods up to 70% cheaper and a haven for shoppers. We had an hour to look round before making our way across the huge car park to Banny's Restaurant for our included lunch of fish, chips, bread and butter and a pot of tea, which was delicious.
As it happens TAIL is an acronym, derived from Treasury Asia Investments Limited, and what happened was that Treasury sold €20m of shares in CREO to a company called Daylasin Limited. Now hang in here, it sounds more convoluted than it is! Daylasin Limited changed its name to Treasury Asia Investments Limited (TAIL) and TAIL sold the €20m of shares to Messrs Barrett and Ronan for a consideration that appears to be worth just €100,000. It’s not quite the sale of a €160m Moscow office block for the price of a laptop, but it seems to be in the same league, even if there hasn’t been any formal allegation of shenanigans by NAMA yet.
Sex appeal
“Truly, she reaches all segments of the population, from the academic literary experts to the kindergarteners,” Texas State Senator Leticia Van de Putte enthusiastically stated in her nomination letter for Dr. Carmen Tafolla, who serves as Writer-in-Residence for Children’s, Youth & Transformative Literature in the Department of Bicultural-Bilingual Studies under the College of Education & Human Development at the University of Texas as San Antonio. “I congratulate San Antonio for having a responsible government that supports the arts because it promotes our great city as a great place to live and raise families,” Van de Putte continued.
It’s going to be incredible… basically we’re talking about the end of Babylonian-style tyranny.
1/4 teaspoon fine sea salt
‘ Because I said so, that’s why.’
Now for the next types of units, you´d need some special bases. Of course this units are pretty rare in almost all armies. The special bases are 60x80mm for chariots and artillery, and some round 60mm for commanders (this bases vary for every army and every player, so don´t take it too seriously).
I mark’d the white combs where they career’d so high, curling over,
NL West:
Kathleen
It is important for us to be as gracious of a guests as you are when you’re the one hosting the party. When you’re invited to someone’s home for dinner or a party, it is always appropriate to bring a hostess gift - the obvious choices being flowers and wine.
In America, everyone works, because no one is born rich, (It does happen, by accident, that a few young people are conditioned by an inherited fortune and a polite education to gallantries and social intrigues, but they are too few in number to be a nuisance, and if they give the least indication of troubling the peace of a family, they find the American world leagued solidly against them to oppose and crush the common enemy. This explains why American bachelors of wealth and leisure do not stay in the United States but come to live in Europe, where they find men of intellect and corrupt women.) and the dreary idleness of the garrison is unknown here, because the country has no standing army.
Sodastream flavour mixers (syrups) are really gross, but I love the glass bottle machine they sell. I imagine myself carbonating a big green juice! (my mom wouldn’t buy one)
“Girl, what you doing half yo’ life?”
Today I went with my sister, Grandma, Kobe and nephew to Reykjavik to go shopping. We went to the mall and the boys went into the play place there and off went the adults to spend some cash :) We went into a few stores looking for clothes (I need something to wear tomorrow night) and found nothing :( I was really hoping to find something nice but I wasn't really into it today. My back has been hurting really bad for a few days now and walking around today was making it even worse. I went and got a few little presents for the shoe (from the Icelandic Yule Lads). Then I bought a craft to do tonight for our bi-weekly Girls Craft Night! We have been getting together for the last month and a half to do some Christmas crafts and it is so much fun.
Well of course the government isn’t going to make it all better – the government is the problem. But that conclusion is a still a step(or more) too far for most people yet.
Gunpowder Gerry
Also, I updated my post “Link: Interesting security technique for Asterisk and FreePBX users (may work with other SIP-based PBX’s also) to show how to use a unique string found in every Obihai device’s SIP registration packets as the “knock” string to allow it to access your server, for those of you using The SunshineNetworks Knock or something similar as a security enhancement. Some other VoIP devices also send similar unique strings, though Linksys/Sipura devices apparently do not (if they do, I haven’t found them).
13 - How do you tell when you're out of invisible ink?
Monsters (10-15%)
**EARS** Join w/ sl st around post of sc on top of one side of the head, 4sc in sm sp, sl st to other side of head, 4sc in a spot an equal distance from the other. Finish off.
Target readers actually are an excellent idea and I would define them as beta+. Unlike the experienced writers they are not analysing the skill of the writer but are responding as a reader. Does this text work? The experienced writer will look for faults and will critique towards making the text more polished. They will also have some idea of how to flirt with the publishing
On Wednesday evening it suddenly dawned on me that the next day would the last time we would meet and I wanted to give her a little gift . No time to go shopping meant it would have to be something handmade. Something quick to make ...but what ?
Of course it's all the same really. Anyone who bought pastels the last time around is likely to have things they can recycle to work the trend again this year. Whether you call pastels candy colours, sugared almond hues, gelato shades, or ice cream colours it's just another way the fashion industry tries to sell us an old idea with a new label. And sugar is much easier to market than say "pale and washed out" or "chalky".
There is a beauty to the landscape of Nebraska that is like the character of its people—not showy or pretentious, but honest and deep-rooted. The land changes with the seasons and the years. It is a show shared by nature and man. Crops are planted, grow, and harvested. Fields are fallow then planted. Crops rotate in sequence and then the field lies fallow again. Time is orderly here.
Deb C
EUR.USD is the easy trade right now, not only is every one talking about it, but it has been pretty smooth on the 12 day charts. I am covering today, looking to get out at anything under 1.2675, its currently 1.2668.... So I may get out if it moves to the .007s. Im not sure how much short covering will be going on so I would prefer to sit back and watch and just play the moves in the very short term trades. Taking the money off the weekend is a must in such a crazy market.
1050D ballistic nylon makes this case extremely lightweight and durable
How do they do it? It can only be because they've grown an additional section in their brain. There can't be any other explanation. These people have an advantage over the other less developed people who simply stop reacting to your conversation while their gaze is fixed on the little screen of their bulge and thumbs race over the keypad, which leaves you feeling as the most boring person on Earth. But don't worry, you're not that boring, you just can't compete with the world surfacing from that screen: web contents, blogs, twitter, email, online shopping...
Arsenal were to host FC Barcelona or the “BarcAliens” as Gooner Daily calls them.
We both laughed and it was over.
In a non stick frying pan take a bit of butter and toast your buns. For the garnish chop some onions, green chillies, coriander leaves and sprinkle some lime juice.
Here's Jeff, surveying his handiwork.
Stop making the kids sit still so much. We'll give you a break on all the testing.
Mayor Williams indicated that it was “very heartening” to see the support for both resolutions, and that action would be taken very soon.
KNOW your actual energy consumption and allow us to show you numerous alternatives to reducing your consumption and operating costs… We do that for you at no charge.
“I think his last words were, ‘Hot dang, I’m so jacked up for this new experience!’” a storm trooper who wished to remain anonymous reported.
Thick elastic band at waistline
* Fill the kitchen sink up with hot water and add a few drops of a scented dish liquid. Not too many, you don’t want it to be harsh. There are many very nice scents out now, from vanilla and lavender to grapefruit. It is completely up to you.
1 inspiration
Have you ever tried anything from Lush before? And I sure hope your weekend was full of fun rather than stress!
One of the highlights of the party is the toljabee (picking). We lay out several different items and have the baby pick from it. Whatever he/she picks determines what’s in store for their future. These are the items we laid out -
For us, and all right minded people, there is no moral dilemma over Capital Punishment for those who torture, rape and murder children. They have no right to exist.
And to show how far I've come so far, here is a before and after:
The Spirit of God, who raised Jesus from death, lives in me, then He who raised Christ from death will also give life to my mortal body by the presence of His Spirit in me. God’s Spirit joins Himself to my spirit to declare that I am a child of God. Since I am a child of God, I will possess the blessings God keeps for His people, and I will also posses with Christ what God has kept for Him; for if I share Christ suffering, I will also share His Glory! Amen!
It is usually disapointing to hear rumors about anything or anyone. I remember Zig Ziglar, the famous motivational speaker, saying " NO one ever erected a statue to a critic". I am not sure if that is 100% true, but I sure can't remember ever seeing one. Same with rumors. I can't eve r remember hearing a ruor that was good news about any thig or anyone. I have heard a rumor that the Justice academy will not be making a new video on the use of deadly force. I have heard several folks complaining because " How are we gong to fill up our class time? It is hard enough to keep them there 8 hours as it is." I can certainly sympathize. But I am not upset, I am elated if this turns out to be true. First, there was a lot of unneccesary foul language on the deadly force video. I get a n awful lot of folks who are chirch goers. I get a lot of midle aged and older females. Personally, I was taught not to use foul language, I try not to as a habit. I was doubly "encouraged " not to curse in front of "Ladies", and that all women were to be trate like ladies , whether they were one or not. Second, The video wastes a lot of precious time talking about the law when most folks couldn't shoot their way out of a tent. THey really need more time on the basics; Grip, stance, trigger squeeze ( not pull, or jerk, please ) . THey need more time on safety. THey need more time on eveything, because they know nothing, and what they do know is many ties dead ( or deadly) wrong.
As the nation and the world closes in on Earth Day, April 22nd, a tsunami of Green propaganda will overwhelm us with all the usual lies about global warming—now called climate change—and calls to reduce the use of all fossil fuels in order to reduce “greenhouse gas” emissions.
if there is a God, He is not the God for me, if He could let this happen
If you’re committed to creating a viable business and a good income, you need the answers to these questions. SCORE Lancaster can help. SCORE offers free and confidential business counseling, including business planning assistance. Call us at 717-397-3092, or find us online at www.scorelancaster.org
I’ve chosen you. You will listen. You are my judge, the true arbiter.
Grilled Bronzino (seabass) Served With Charred Seasonal Grilled Vegetables
I did not do this as a legalistic Pharisee; I did it as a Christ-loving, grace-saved, grace-exalting believer whose passion is to please the Lord.
Find some time to sit and ponder these questions, or at least have them running around in your brain while you go aout your business.
(educational platform begins on page 5)
Hours after Mr. Obama delivered his predawn speech and left Afghanistan, insurgents attacked a fortified compound that houses thousands of Westerners, including U.S. Department of Defense contractors and European Union police trainers, on the outskirts of Kabul.
Castro's propaganda ministry is not notorious for fawning over Republicans. But lately they've been gushing over the Ranking Republican member of the U.S. Senate Committee on Foreign Relations, Senator Richard Lugar. "Changing Cuba Policy-Staff Trip Report to the Committee on Foreign Relations United States Senate," is the title of the report Senator Lugar released on Tuesday February 24rd to delirious and unanimous acclaim from the mainstream media. This acclaim-- to the surprise of no Cuba-watchers--was quickly echoed in Havana. "After 47 years," starts this report, "the unilateral embargo on Cuba..." Let's stop right here. Webster's defines "embargo" as "a government order imposing a trade barrier." As a verb it's defined as "to prevent commerce."…."(the embargo) has failed to achieve its stated purpose of bringing democracy to the Cuban people."
11. Match the size of the pan with the amount of food you’re cooking. Using a large pan when you’re cooking only a small amount of food wastes both the time and energy needed to heat the pan.
The story is decent. I read the first of 8 parts one night, then read all 7 parts in a row when my prescription kept me up all night. It took about 5 hours to read it all.
To make it even better it was also our 2 years &
Munchkin gave me a look that meant "Be quiet, Mom!"
Now, the most obvious changes are the activation roll and the armor saves. Let’s talk a second about them.
@Jyothi Hegde 2011
Weakness: It has been much documented that Missouri is weak in the paint and in its losses that has been crystal clear. In the Tigers’ two losses to Kansas St they were out-rebounded by 10 boards per contest. They were just beat up inside. That is the book on Missouri, especially if it’s shooting poorly. They have to score to win because they just aren’t strong enough to rebound.
The first thing to be said about this film is that it's consistently engrossing and beautifully crafted. The film's central mystery never really carries the doom-laden life-or-death feeling of, say, Chinatown (1974) or The Ninth Gate (1999); instead, Polanski seems to mostly be taking pleasure in his own mastery, filling his film with a wealth of idiosyncratic visual and literary touches that lend its relatively humdrum plot a welcome off-kilter quality that makes it considerably more gripping than it might have been in less confident hands.
I haven’t seen the film of which this is apparently a remake, but most reviews say that the earlier film is the better one. However, I really enjoyed Mogambo. Clark Gable is always worth watching, and although he looks older here, he still has that sex appeal that he is known for. He is well matched with Ava Gardner, who is simply stunning. Beautiful, sexy and funny, a large part of what made this film so enjoyable, was Ava’s performance (she more or less steals the show). I’ve always thought that Grace Kelly was over-rated as an actress, and although her performance here is fine, she pales in comparison to her two co-stars.
In my view, crime within Glasgow's Asian community has been allowed to grow unfettered for years. Why? Because the police have been afraid to fight it in case they are accused of racism.
We all know what happened next, having seen the sanitised version of the events in the movie Hotel Rwanda.
I ask what went wrong? During the time K.D. Mathandzima was the Prime Minister, and even during the military tenure of Bantu Holomisa, the town was very beautiful, fully maintained and clean. People had jobs. Then factories that created them closed down after 1994, because they were no longer subsidized and so could no longer cope with the competition from China, India, etc.
And naked boobs, and flowers too.
Although the dominant message was redemption and forgiveness, I was surprised by one person's initial reaction to this possibility.
Everything speeds up,
in the wall.
sitting next
Note there have been some reports of health issues when people are sensitive to Electromagnetic Fields also.
Cool again
For some who hunt large rivers and open waters, using baited lines to chum gators is their preferred tactic. They are not allowed to set lines from shore – and catch those “Tree Shakers.” Baited lines must be hand-held or secured to a boat. Plus, no hooks may be used; only 2-inch wooden pegs wedged into the bait and thrown in the vicinity of a gator or in a likely location. Common baits are beef lung and rotten chicken and are pretty repulsive. The gator swallows the bait and the Tug-O-War begins until it is hit with snatch hooks or harpoons.
OK, so its like, last night? I take an ibuprofen for a wee little headache and that always gives me psychedelic dreams, including last night, truthfully, I dreamt I had NOTHING to blog and was setting up a photo shoot, which was the truth, actually, here at the breakfast table. Nothing to blog! The wife hears this and is like
“Whatever feeling you are giving about the relationship is exactly what you will receive back in the relationship. If you’re feeling joyful about the relationship most of the time, you’re giving love, and you must receive love and joy back through that relationship because that’s the frequency you’re on.” -Rhonda Byrne, The Power
But they might be good for FMBT this week!
Sow and sow and see
When Jesus sets us free, we bloom.
It was Mercer who had coached the teenage Whiting through her first recording, of her father’s “My Ideal,” and although Maurice Chevalier and Frank Sinatra had already recorded the tune, her version sold well.
July 7 2011
The party throwing endeavor was the push we needed to get the rest of our crap, I mean stuff, unpacked and all the boxes recycled. So we no longer resemble the Beverly Hillbillies in the neighborhood. well, except maybe here:
Many joggers passed me on the way, as I attempted to hide my quick breaths from their steady inspirations. Next time, I’ll be right alongside them. haha… sure.
There is tragic news to report this week. As many of you know, the Vintner’s left on a ship last week. Upon the arrival of Lex’s return, he reported having seen the ship not far off the coast. It appears the ship was attacked though we don’t know why. He is quoted in saying “It was still burning and there were bodies strewn across the deck, dead. The captain did not wish to risk the lives of his crew to investigate it further. We pulled alongside and called out for any survivors, but there was no answer.”
* Celebrate and promote successful partnerships and Wiki achievements
The bus stopped in the middle of nowhere. We piled out and looked at the sky.
“I’m homo for the holidays, get used to it dear!
Like any good financial advisor, I asked Sarah if she and her husband had purchased life insurance yet. She said no, but that her dad had mentioned it and suggested they buy it. But they hadn’t done it.
As I've laid out before on this blog, beer is made by adding hot water to ground malted barley (a process called mashing) and then, after the resulting activated enzymes have done their work to convert the starches in the grain into sugar, the sugar is washed away and fermented. That washing process is called sparging. Broadly speaking there are two main sparging techniques--batch sparging and fly sparging. In batch sparging you drain off that initial infusion of hot water from the malt, then add another slug of hot water, stir to dissolve more sugar, and run off again. In fly sparging the brewer sprinkles hot water onto the malt at a steady rate and collects the sugary run-off.
And to top it off the alarm that was supposed to go off, the one that would have had she been hooked up right in bed and not the chair was so quiet because this new chair suggestion (the cheaper one) is equipped with a low alarm, which the caregiver thought was the same as the alarm on the bed used to notify them that a battery is low. I guess it's so they don't have to hear people dying and feel the guilt they did nothing to stop it.
The computer I produce my maps on just died, and the program I've been using for the last ten years can't be gotten now and has ceased to exist. That's okay, the new publisher is better, I'll get the hang of it ... but it means redoing every freaking map I have. Yeah. I have plenty of time for that.
Chaucer certainly bloody well did.
Saying "cheese" for me this morning. He was the only one this happy, as he did not quite get that we are supposed to actually sleep an extra hour for daylight savings time.
Let’s go back to elementary school, when the idea was egalitarian: show everyone in class how much you love them. Pick out the valentines that said something a little more special for that crush sitting across the room. Agonize over this decision. Realize that there are three or four of the special valentines, and no, that creep with the boogers doesn’t have one yet either, and panic. Somehow, in your ten-year-old head, understand that your crush won’t understand the significance, but the booger boy will. Stay oblivious to this life lesson for another decade or two.
Police say White punched the girl on the forehead during the fight. The girl was taken to the hospital for treatment of her injuries and White was taken to jail.
My opinion: Go with people you love to have a good time with & you will have fun at this movie!
The APA – American Psychiatric Association – meets this coming weekend in Pilladelphia to congratulate themselves for devising yet more ways to categorise humans as abnormal, disordered, not normal ; and so offer them unlimited membership as lifelong dependents upon the dubious benefits of their training and worldview; and the false promises and products of the pharmaceutical industry.
Night is falling on our enchanted realm
-Green tea smoked duck breast with Brasserie Dupont Foret
and forgive us our sins
Lately I've been feeling a bit less than in the urban homesteading department. We've had rain for almost a month solid, and aside from the 17 things we have planted not much is going on around the urban homestead yet this spring. We don't really get to have fun in the garden here until around April due to our lengthy Northern Coast rainy season. So today as I was feeling somewhat like an urban homesteading loser I came across this awesome post by Half Acre Homestead titled "At What Point Am I Real?" Her post pretty much sums up the conundrum we as urban homesteaders can face when surrounded by the multitude of urban homesteaders, all trying to live self sufficiently. It can be overwhelming, let's face it! Being the main admin for the Take Back Urban Home-steading(s) page I'm inundated by hundreds if not thousands of incredible urban homesteaders every day on line through blogs, web pages, articles, etc. and it's both amazing and terrifying at times. While I love all of the new ideas and information I'm amassing I have to be careful not to end up on "urban homestead overload."
One of the best ways to keep yourself more productive is when you are not doing anything anymore and believe you have already accomplished everything for the day, then devote a time for yourself when you can observe or shadow the more tenured or the more ‘expert’ colleagues on your team and of course, your own supervisor.
There was a mat on the floor for the babies to sleep and we lay the sleeping ones down and went back for more. About that time, one of the mamas brought a bucket full of bottles and set it down. We each ended up with 2 babies in our laps and a bottle in each hand (continuously) for about 30 minutes. After food it was nap time. Sigh.
1. Journey To The Inside Of The Sun
Luke 10:30 Then Jesus answered and said a certain man went from Jerusalem to Jericho and fell among thieves who
Optional: 1/2 teaspoon nutmeg
Dogfish Head Craft Brewery Burton Baton
To make what's already an extremely boring and long story short, the lady stood me up yesterday, had an excuse, apologized, and offered to drop the price if I met her today. I agreed, and guess what? I got stood up AGAIN today! What. The. Hell. Is this funny for people?! Is it a joke to waste other people's time?!
2 Evening Star 7:48
Saturday, April 21st: Barnes & Noble, 15900 La Cantera Parkway, San Antonio, TX; 2:00 pm
I sent the mom an email a while back and told her she was one of the meanest people I'd ever met. A mutual acquaintance had suggested it was a shame that I said that, but it is truly how I felt. Her actions are ones of cruelty, stemming from pain, I get that, but does being in pain yourself ever excuse cruelty towards others? I guess, for me, I can't look at my actions and see that I'm hurting people and casually go about it anyway. That is the heart of self righteousness and a person can't truly heal from any kind of pain while being that way and behaving in ways that hurt others, especially if their actions are intentional. That doesn't even begin to dig into what this mother is doing to her very own daughter, that was just about her daughter's best friend. What she's doing to her own daughter is much much worse and could potentially destroy any chance she has of ever having a relationship with her. It's tragic that the one person this woman cares about, her whole world, is her daughter, yet she's driving a big wedge in between them, so much so, that her daughter is looking to manipulate her instead of getting what she wants by being honest and forthright.
This was my first card attempt but the peacocks ended up not really GOING. So rather than forcing it, I just let it be.
I love that kid. And honestly, it wouldn't surprise me if he did. We pray every day that God will make our kids world changers. If he chooses to use Aaron to find a cure for cancer, SO.BE.IT. I love his heart....
Assemble pita by topping with lettuce, tomato slices, chicken pieces and sauce to your liking! Devour!!
I haven't crafted in a long, long time.
Are you ready? Here is my
● Photos: Cheran - Community Self-Defense
I have a stack of fabric that is just screaming to me to cut it up into more bags/purses. Finding the time to get it all done is another thing though. I'm slowly working on it and have some plans for doing Bag Parties starting in late February. What is a bag party you ask? Well, it's where you get a group of your friends/family to come over to your house one evening or one day during the weekend for a few hours. I will bring all my bags/purses over and after washing their hands, everyone can look at them, feel them, look in them, try them on, etc. I will also bring along some fabrics I have that has not been made into bags yet, in case you don't see what you like. For hosting a party, I will give you 50% off 1 item, up to $25 off. Looking at the bags/purses online is OK, but seeing them in person is fantastic!!
Brent has been sick for three days now. I am pretty sure it started out as a cold, but I decided to take him to the doctor this morning because he hasn't been eating or sleeping - both of which he usually does a LOT more of when he's sick. Throw in the low-grade fever and colored mucus and I figured it was a sinus infection. The doctor didn't check for a sinus infection - but said he has an ear infection and the antibiotic will take care of all of it.
Given all those postulates, what decision would you expect the rulers of
I don't usually take pictures of the television, but the slaughter on the screen was too much for me to look away from. I know you're thinking that 16 - 31 is a respectable score...
It means she will have handed over more than Beyoncé did at the birth of her daughter Blue Ivy Carter in Lenox Hill hospital in New York, where the singer reportedly spent $3,200 (£1,972) per night for a four-bedroom luxury apartment within the building.
“Come Around is a feel good pop-rock record that people can relate to and grow-up with,” says Kieren Smith (Guitar/Vocals). “It has a definitive and original sound that gives fans a clear view of what Sing It Loud really is.”
u love,give 2 pple u want 2 see more of,give
Please submit your responses by 9/1/12 to be guaranteed to be considered for this years award. Entries from 9/1/12 to 9/21/12 may be considered for this years award.
They’re usually fun and hard work too. I’ve been very lucky in going to some great festivals from Australia to the US and lots of other places in between. There was the time I was sat next to someone in a green plastic hula skirt and a man in a kilt on the other side… but that’s a rarity and I’m sure won’t happen in Bristol. Festivals are growing ever important these days so it’s great to see how CrimeFest has grown to become what seems to me the biggest and most broadly-based popular fiction festival we currently have.
Twelve years ago, my cousin Grace was born at 25 weeks, and weighed 1 lb., 11 oz. She is such a special girl... brave, strong, smart as a whip, and of course, baby crazy! So the minute she found out I was pregnant, she has been dying to meet Lea. After several unsuccessful attempts at feeling Lea kick while still in my belly, and then a very long wait while she recovered in the NICU, Grace was finally able to meet our girl today for the first time. She squealed with excitement at the first sight of Lea - it was so cute!
to see what wisdom I could find.
Modern developments
That they readily meet invasions, when they come.
You see, the government is a corporation. The people of the United States are the constitutors (debtors) of that corporation.
What are your favorite "Name-Songs?" Do you share a name with any songs that you know of?
#101...Betty Wright
Wild geese that fly with the sun or moon on their wings…
The next week, I see Tony at church and his body language is very stern. I attempt to say hello, but he ignores me. I’m not a confrontational person, and can’t figure out why he was upset, but decide to let it drop.
We were having so much fun
The lightest and most refreshing of the bunch, the Euclidean 75 is made with gin, lemon, and sugar, then topped off with an effervescent and refreshingly tart Berliner-Weisse. A creation from Denver bartender and beer cocktail afficionado Ryan Conklin of Euclid Hall.
Admission: Free. Donations are accepted on behalf of the Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation.
“On May 20, 2012, a rare solar eclipse alignment will happen between the Earth, the Sun and Alcyone in the Pleiades Constellation. According to myth, the hunter Orion was in love with the SEVEN SISTERS and pursued them until the gods took them to safety, transforming them first into doves, and then into stars. Maia, the eldest of the seven sisters, gave birth to Hermes (Thoth).”
The original Sachertorte has two layers, this cake has just one. A Sachertorte is the most famous of Viennese culinary delights.
Putting aside the good manners I was raised with, society decrees you are invisible, untrustworthy, possibly insane. Your story is false, your intentions dubious. Sorry; no money, just advice – Get a job!
I have been ordering some things to use for Christmas projects. Haven't felt like going out shopping so on line shopping was my solution. I have been watching and studying all the posts on Copic Markers. I have a few and wanted to get more since I am now addicted to rubber stamps. I just could not justify the cost so I broke down and ordered the Twin Touch markers. They have not come yet. The price was considerably less and the reviews that I read seem like they are very much like the Copics--refillable and you can get new nibs for them. Can't wait til they get here. Wish me luck.
For the next three hours, we watched movies together, intermittently napping, and sipping on drinks. It was relaxing and pleasant and nice to spend time alone together, and to feed my boy the vegetable soup he was served.
i was going to write more but honestly...i forgot. hope you're having a beautiful day.
Kings may be blest, but Tam was glorious,
-2 FuzziBunz diapers (one one-size and one size small (was free with my purchase!))
“Where have you come from?” the Lord asked Satan. Satan answered the Lord, “I have been patrolling the earth, watching everything that’s going on.”
Some of you are thinking...I'm not a camper...and to be honest I am not either really.
Rousseff still has the option of vetoing the bill, one of the most controversial to pass Brazil’s Congress in recent years. Several government sources told Reuters they expect her to do so because the approved text ditched a hard-bargained compromise deal the government took months to reach.
Both “if” and “when” are used in the Future Real Conditional, but the use is different from other Real Conditional forms. In the Future Real Conditional, “if” suggests that you do not know if something will happen or not. “When” suggests that something will definitely happen at some point; we are simply waiting for it to occur. Notice also that the Simple Future is not used in if-clauses or when-clauses.
“You’re on your own, dude. My computer keeps redirecting me when I do a search”. No sarcasm this time, only frustration was in his voice.
~ Teaching me to meditate.
So for now I stand at the kitchen sink and cry.
I think I said “thanks, I got it in Rome” at least three times today. Can you blame me? It’s an awesome dress. And it’s not just an awesome dress. It’s an awesome new dress. And guess what? It’s an awesome new dress from Rome. So that increases said awesomeness. Do you follow me? It doesn’t matter, just look at the pictures. And then click “follow”. It’s that little button thing in the lower right corner.
Let’s make a date to get together, and we can spend some time talking, and checking out the guys together as they pass by…
With any luck, she’ll be back on form for Leeds this August. I’ve missed you, Florence, and this really just wasn’t you. Let’s hope America hasn’t made you grow up too fast.
describe without comparing it to something inappropriate. They say
I’d love to to post full-length reviews for every drama I watch, but honestly, that’s probably just never going to happen. Instead, I try and at least put together these mini-reviews designed for both the writer and reader afflicted with drama ADD.
Talking in a stopped elevator is easier with flashlights.
Describing scenes by sound rather than sight can give the scene movement. We do not perceive sound as being static. A train whistle in the distance is not always the same pitch, is not always the same volume. Even taste seems more dynamic than sight; for example, the taste of the smoky air on a winter day. And smell is the most evocative of all the senses; perhaps the smell of lilacs makes one think of grandmother’s house.
Commas seem to cause a lot of confusion when there are more than one involved.
hb Inspired by Emily Dickinson.
Received my package today and I am stoked!! Received some holy basil, wild cherry tomato, maca, lambs quarters, and nettles! All organic as well...
Trevor was one of the characters that just came so naturally. Maybe it’s because I’d totally hang out with him if I could. When I introduced him into the story, there were only two other main characters. One who was a tight-lipped and stony girl and a nervous, yet snarky kid who grew self-conscious around her. So when Trevor popped in, I wanted someone who was going to say whatever the crap he wanted without feeling bad or thinking about the repercussions of his jokes. I wanted someone to lighten the mood. Take all the characters out of intense moments with a funny. So I took all those funny qualities (ha! I totally almost spelled that chwalities) I love about the men in my life and stuck them inside this dude.
Thank the Lord for new days, for start-overs, and for GRACE! I know that I can't do this without HIS help and without the Holy Spirit prompting me to get my exercise in 4-6 times each week, and to eat the right portions sizes and only when I should!
Now on to my card for today! I wasn't sure of how this card was coming along at first, and then once I just kept adding things here and there....the finished product kind-of makes me swoon a little. It isn't a typical card from me, but I like that....definitely gotta keep some spice in life when it comes to card making! Here is what I created:
I just used my Aquapainter and Poppy Parade and Pool Party Reinkers on watercolor paper. I put a little grey around the image for a shadow.
Mary is a natural born medic – deft and gentle. A Menthol Patch on both wrists. Ice block chopped into manageable pieces with one of my knives and then bound to my hands with rags. She promised to come back early the next morning to check on me.
3 Ibid.
You ALL have Free-Will, Freedom of Speech, and Movement. Time to pull together to help one another by forming “Movements” that actually SHOW the effect NOT against the flow.
Key to Measurement bk1 p. 27 - 33
The woman called security, who in turn called the police. An officer spoke to the neighbor, who denied standing naked in front of his neighbor’s door; he said it was a friend. He declined to provide police with the name of the friend and said he would take full responsibility for the incident. He also mentioned he had been drinking and had “one too many.”
To stay in jail, refuse to sign or to post bail.
UPDATE (1): 13th October, 2011. EDIT. The Irish Independent has two Paddy-positive articles in which the Maybourne sale by NAMA is questioned. The first has Paddy criticising NAMA’s abilities to maximise returns and the second just questions why NAMA sold the loans now. Meanwhile Britain’s Legal Week demonstrates how much of a jamboreee this transaction was for the lawyers. It says “Hogan Lovells, which was appointed to NAMA’s inaugural legal panel last year, advised the body through a London-based team led by restructuring partner Paul McLoughlin, who was assisted by senior associate Stuart Tait. The firm, which worked alongside Ireland’s Maples and Calder, initially advised NAMA in April on a restructuring of AIB and Bank of Ireland’s debt initially provided to Maybourne, which transferred to NAMA”
Generalized Anxiety Disorder (GAD) – is described by a constant worry about everyday things. People can become overly concerned about money, health, family, work or other issues. Sometimes just the thought of getting through the day produces anxiety. Even though the worry seems pointless, it is hard for people to stop worrying.
How about you? Will you share eternity with your mom in the presence of our Savior? If she is still alive and doesn’t know Christ, ask God to give you the opportunity and courage to lead her to saving faith in Jesus.
haircuts at the barber,
Cold is the mind-killer.
You know, one of those thingies where lots of dudes (sometimes dudettes) come together and make music with a "message". Of course you do, you only wanted this since you hit puberty. Yes, that kind of band, where great music (whatever genre it may be) is created by talented men and women.
For the life of me I can’t understand giving up total control on your investments. Active managers have flaws but so does the passive approach. Well we live in a free world so make your decision accordingly. I am only trying to point out factors that few have made in the financial press.
As I was reading these chapters today, it struck me the love God displayed toward Pharoah and the Egyptians. His intent was to demonstrate Himself as the One True God…
Until, I realize it was the flipping of the (or just plain "flipping") calendar that hit me so hard.
If I may butt in here into Jewcy's narrative - the ADL does not represent the Jewish community in America - but it does not represent its own interest. In my opinion, simply put, the ADL and the other organizations in question here - the American Jewish Committee, B'nai Brith International, and the Jewish Institute of National Security Affairs - represent the interests of only one entity - Israel. They are in lock step on ALL the issues affecting Israel.
The second worst offender this year is Marsha J. Evans, President and CEO
No refund was ever given.
Across Europe the number of people feeling that their financial situation would get worse over the coming months continued to increase.
Random House
NFP is an umbrella term for certain methods used to achieve and avoid pregnancies. These methods are based on observation of the naturally occurring signs and symptoms of the fertile and infertile phases of a woman’s menstrual cycle. Couples using NFP to avoid pregnancy abstain from intercourse and genital contact during the fertile phase of the woman’s cycle. No drugs, devices, or surgical procedures are used to avoid pregnancy.
Some of the feminine-hygiene machines "appeared to have been entered with an unknown tool," said McGlothian-Taylor.
And now it’s 1am and Yay! we’re HOME!!…and just finishing off……Would be great to have you leave a comment about what stands out for you…….
I was really happy to read a book about curly girls and their curly hair problems and solutions. There were so many great stories and solutions. What I learned was that girls with curls, no matter what nationality, have struggled with taming, styling and understanding how to maintain their curls. It was actually very comforting!
1tbsp Fenugreek seeds
“For damaging government property.”
by Andrew P. Napolitano
So, I do a good bit of gaming. Plus, I try to comment on various gaming forums, I've tried to start drawing monsters again, and while doing all of the above, I'm trying to keep the Wife happy, and take care of an old house we bought last year. I can get busy at times, and the free time I have left over from work seems to vanish quickly.
The final festive making has finished - just need to start on my collection of January birthdays now - and I've booked a fair for the end of February too :) I finished this fairy the other day - I don't think I'll be able to part with her - she is my favourite so far;
So here are two email subject lines I saw this morning.
Mr has been working steadily with the local School District, after getting some final paperwork in order. He's also begun attending lodge here with the local Masons, and is excited to not only be accepted and welcomed with open arms, but to be sponsored to continue his learning within.
Barbara Walters: Isn't that interesting? In a few minutes we will be listening to the chicken tell, for the first time, the heart-warming story of how it experienced a serious case of molting, and went on to accomplish its lifelong dream of crossing the road.
Once you have that you are ready to begin.
Whenever I'm not sure what to make for dinner I usually pick 2 or 3 ingredients that I have, put them into google search and let the ideas come to me. This was the first hit I got when I put in salmon and basil pesto recipe. Matt and I both really liked it.
management
All I can offer is truth not lie:
Jesus said,
...when do I get my trophy? Tell me there's a trophy!
Two daughters, two granddaughters and now I
Ray Bradbury—for Halloween Tree, The Illustrated Man, Something Wicked This Way Comes, and The October Country
*don’t be bothered by this. it works. really.
When you last heard from me, I was playing, largely unsuccessful, mediator in a titanic battle of wills between my lovely bride, Dragonwife, and my son, Darth Spoilboy. Since last Friday several deals, for both a new Kia and several used cars fell through for any number of reason you might be able to guess. As time went on though, the main issue became how Dragonwife and I wanted to go slow and look around for the “right” car figuring we could juggle the duties of driving him to and from work with the vehicles, we already own. However, the hormone-crazed teenage Spoilboy wanted something bought immediately and became increasingly aggravated with what he saw was our glacial pace.
Add to that, I have decided that I will not delete the blog, as I had been contemplating. The temptation to delete the blog sourced from hurt places, places that I could not write about, perhaps. Things that I wanted to say, yet felt could not be said, in order to preserve some level of privacy, dignity, or respect... for myself, or perhaps, others in my life. In not being able to say those very things that needed to be expressed, however, I was bursting at the seams. Frustration at not being able to speak of certain things is what has tempted me to delete the entire blog. I realized the parallel, however. In life, when I have not been able to work through an emotion, I have abandoned ship. In the end, I become lost at sea, from jumping from place to place, my roots cut off, unable to feel the warmth of the earth.
If I hadn't stopped reading before, I would now. It's a jumble of plot lines and confusing as hell. Simplify.
This weekend, I saw the movie Drive. Basically, I will watch anything with Ryan Gosling in it. But the soundtrack is also excellent (in case anyone was looking for something to listen to). I sort of feel like a heroine in some nineties movie about high school in these pictures. WHY DIDN'T YOU WRITE ME RYAN?
The beer in question was from Italian brewers Revelation Cat and was a three year old lambic that had been aged in Laphraoig Malt Whisky casks.
For the vegetables:
You must prepare for your dream.
Maybe I'll video them on Saturday and get a modern update.
Huge thanks to all of you who play along with us, we couldn't do it without you!
from the Kane Chronicle Series, I enjoyed Hunger Games, I read Animal Farm. I also went out a lot; caught up with my non-existent social life and stopped thinking of both the query business and writing that perfect book.
He wrote arrangements for, among others, Paul Whiteman, Louis Prima, and Lionel Hampton. His song writing hits include "Let Me Off Uptown" recorded by Anita O'Day.
I love this chapter! It is filled with encouragement, practical advice, and straight-talk. Even this very useful bit of instruction in verse 3 includes the carrot of explanation to motivate the reader who must know the answer to the ever-present question “why?” in verse 4.
$6 COCKTAILS
I want them prepared for college in general terms and in academic terms. I want them to be college ready while being also mentally sane and happy people, not burned out, not having received certain grades from cheating, and not relying on prescription medications to keep them mentally stable or calmed down. Extra-curriculars are vital and important but they should not go so far as to put so much pressure on kids that they burn out or crack under the pressure.
The blooms kit always comes delivered in a pretty chiffon bag & when you open it all the lovely blooms & ribbons come tumbling out. Karen pops the pins, charms, buttons & gems in a little cellophane bags to prevent them from damaging the other more delicate contents!
Pages:336
So sorry that my blog for today hasn’t likely to have excited you but I’ve felt low so tough monkeys really. Once the rain finally stops, I shall be able to bore you with our geocaching travels of which we have planned this weekend.
Yesterday it rained. The day before it rained. It seems like it's been raining in London for decades We had some folks over in the morning for a playdate but after X went down for his nap, Cate wanted to do 'sumfing fun'.
Anyway, Gyles Brandreth has been an obsessive diary writer since the age of 11, and when I heard he was releasing a book containing the best bits of a 50 year period (1950 - 2000) I was keen to pick it up. It's a huge book, and at 700+ pages this will no doubt take me years to get through, but that doesn't bother me (well, maybe it does a bit!). I'm still wading through the school years at present, and whilst entertaining, I must admit I am secretly desperate for him to hurry up and get famous, so that I can get stuck in to some of the much promised anecdotes and juicy tittle-tattle from his celebrity encounters!
I don't want to ride her in the saddle I have until I am absolutely happy that it fits and is not going to make her sore. In the meantime, while we are still walking, I might ride her bareback - I have been long-reining her up and down a long paddock at the yard, so I may ride her bareback to begin with in there. I don't much fancy hacking out bareback, as she will undoubtedly spook...and I would either fall off or have to grip really hard - which doesn't exactly help!
an online community that bridges the gap between readers and authors, with the mission of promoting great literature and bringing together the literary community. The WLC offers helpful promotions to authors, reviewers, bloggers, and editors by creating avenues to bring them
I just got done watching the season finale of Justified. God, I love that show.
"Our Feed the Future program -- we’ve been able to help increase productivity there," President Obama said.
In 1993 he and his graduate students announced their holographic principle of the Universe: that if all reality were indeed a hologram — a 3D model of everything captured as an image of our reality — maybe black holes were images of events taking place very far away: back in time; that our reality is a projection of a holographic record stored at the outer reaches of the Universe. The team became bold. They called a consortium of the world’s top physicists to a conference at Stanford in November 2009 and Susskind invited Stephen Hawking to speak. By then, Hawking was talking about ‘sideways’ or lateral time. But he was interested in Susskind’s holographic theory. And Susskind’s team was about to put it to the test.
Challenges I am entering with this card
I just couldn't stay away from these little cuties any longer, so yet another of the Sugar Nellie images today, this one is 'Verity' and I think she's gorgeous. I re-sized her this time so she's in close-up instead of the full length image.
4) USA Today
2 present
The bitchy girls still didn't speak to me. The only girl I hung out with was a high school friend who came out -- in the way that it is more commonly understood these days -- the following year and ended up living in the Bay Area. I happened to be there in 1993 on the same day as the Gay Pride Parade and let out the loudest Rebel yell you ever heard when I saw her marching.
Ready? Set…WRITE!
“He came unto His own (the Jews) and His own received Him not.”
In the 1930s, under the regime of Joseph Stalin, music was forced to be contained within certain boundaries of content and innovation. Composers were discouraged from experimenting with new sounds or new instruments, and required to have their music “approved” before it was performed. Some composers had to leave the country when their music was considered “anti-Communist” by the government censors.
5:48pm: THUD
American History Distorted: How Lawrence O’Donnell Unintentionally Shows Why Contemporary Leftist-Style “Liberalism” Is Wrong Report: Iran Funding Weapons Smuggling from Libya to Egypt & Gaza Turkey’s interminable wait for hell to freeze over PA daily: Open University in Bethlehem holds event honoring terrorist Abu Jihad Erdogan on Turkey: “One nation, one state, one flag and one religion.”
In an industry clogged up with electronics and shoe gazers the boys’ offering of folk-pop loveliness is a breath of fresh air, literally. One listen of their debut single ‘Sea Serpents’ will immediately conjure up dreamy pre- Raphaelite images of forests and fields. “We always vowed to never use synthesizers,” says Thornley. “We have no special effects when we record, just cigarette smoke, mirrors and empty pizza boxes.”
I recently read a quote on facebook that was posted from pinterest (no idea who came up with it), the quote said “don’t judge me by my past, I don’t live there anymore.” I think it is interesting and sad that many of us Christians seem to hold onto the sins of others (especially fellow Christians) longer than non-believers. It is no secret that we are all sinners. We were all born into sin, we will sin throughout our lives, and we will all die as sinners…the only hope we have is that our Savior gave His life to redeem us. “Go and learn what this means, ‘I desire mercy, and not sacrifice.’ For I came not to call the righteous, but sinners.” Matthew 9:13
I have been inundated with St. Patrick's Day-related press releases. I believe it has become a bigger drinking holiday than New Year's Eve -- at least, from a non-wine writing perspective. All kinds of beer and spirits companies have presented their boozes to me as PERFECT FOR ST. PATRICK'S DAY!
1/4 tsp. mace
This is why Motherhood is the riskiest profession on earth. When we love someone, we are vulnerable. And Mothers LOVE a lot! That’s why Mothers have their hearts broken all the time. It’s hard to see those you love—your own flesh and blood—be hurt by things/people/and themselves in life. But, like Lewis says, we can’t stop loving just to keep our heart from hurting.
I will take no bull-calf from your stalls, *
What does this army do? Does it fight? Let me draw your attention to two obvious points. First, "he judges and makes war" (Rev 19:11); "out of his mouth comes a sharp sword with which to strike down the nations" (Rev 19:15); "He will rule them with an iron scepter" (Rev 19:15); "He treads the winepress of the fury of the wrath of God Almighty" (Rev 19:15). He. He. He. He. He does it all. What do we do? Nothing. What does His army contribute? Nothing.
By the time Crosby embarked upon a solo career in 1931 he had shed the tenor range. He understood that the microphone favored baritones. Crosby assimilated many different styles, ranging from classical to jazz, and fused them into a unique sound, which accounted for his meteoric rise.
Tempe, AZ 85281
A recent article, “Best Vegetables to Grow in the Shade,” by Colleen Vanderlinden, which was published in 2012 in Mother Earth News’ Guide to Organic Gardening, takes a look at the shade side of the equation. Vanderlinden makes a distinction between dappled shade and partial shade. Dappled shade, which is the result of a high canopy that isn’t too dense, can still produce fairly bright conditions for the garden. As a result, the garden that experiences periods of dappled shade benefits from more sunlight than you might think, even though it may come in a less direct form.
The trembling in his pain-wracked, wiry frame subsided. The noise faded away as the dispute seemed to be resolved. Bobby took another drag, coughed on the harshness of the Vietnamese tobacco, and slowly sat up. His feet bracketed the bucket. The surface of the vile liquid shimmered slightly under the influence of some small tremor Bobby couldn't feel.
**salt and pepper to taste**
Ah, that’s a really good question. I suppose I’m just crazy enough to think that little me could be in the movies. I’ve always been in love with acting and I don’t know yet if this was a smart move, but here I am.
- Elastic on the front
At this point, handlers for the event ushered Gehry’s interlocutors along.
Media briefing to discuss pending juvenile justice reform, including Madden’s bill to consolidate the Texas Youth Commission and the Texas Juvenile Probation Commission (HB 1915). This measure appears to be a continuation of the Legislature’s TYC reform efforts of relying less on remote, ineffective facilities, and instead using more local, community-based corrections and treatment alternatives that have been shown to improve public safety, improve youth outcomes, and reduce costs.
On this occasion we were going to the UK to hike in Scotland, visit some bloggers, and see some sights.
These linguistic conceptualizations may have a deterministic influence in emotional and cognitive ideas about transgender as well. The socio-cultural aspects of Confucianism and Taoism may also play a significant role in determining attitudes and behaviour towards transgender. Western Christian and medical thought also may contribute to the negative stereotypes of transgender in Hong Kong.
"Give me a Leonard Cohen afterworld, so I can sigh eternally."--Kurt Cobain (Nirvana), "Penny Royal Tea"
April 2012 Exam Cram will be held at the library:
Search for the entrance stone, and more.
What an awesome monthly Grand prize worth over $100!!
An ambien and several hours later, we get: “Why do people say that? ‘Long Time No See.’ It sounds like a Tonto impersonation,” to which Asheville City Councilman Gordon Smith replies: “As deer make many pellets, many jokes you make.” Smith goes on to invite Muller on an outing, to which Muller declines citing the likelihood that there will be “a bunch of lesbians there.”
Well, it turns out that at this juncture Amazon said to itself, that they were not just distributors. They realized this was not a handful of people wanting to do ebooks. They realized that this is one huge market. And honestly, why be just tied into the normative publishers? By that time the publishers had become so dependent on Amazon and B&N that they could not afford to live without them. Book Stores closed up by the hundreds. People bought books with one click and an address for Fed-Ex or UPS. It was that simple.
